That's amazing! Thank you so much
I would agree because it made for babies 3 and 4, but I finally got my princess and she came with a buddy.  They are my heartbeat.
And I hope they cleared it with Legal...
No.  I now own the rights to "Console games are: More Graphics" and all of its variants.  Every time you want to use it, it's going to cost one human liver.  I can't budge on this, I am sorry.
Reddits april fools prank: take useless video make it viral
Get outta here with your "not practical" talk! Manual trans is quite practical for many drivers, there's nothing high horse about that...  you can push start a manual if you have a dead battery. a new car with a manual costs ~$1000 less than an automatic.   manual trans allows you to choose gear based on conditions of the road ahead.  Automatics can't (yet) anticipate what's ahead.  manual trans allows progressive shifting (lots of throttle, highest possible gear, low rpm) for better fuel economy. Automatic thinks lots of throttle means "downshift and accelerate quickly"
Capitalism is about supply, demand and a free market. It is not about taking advantage of a captive market. It is absolutely unethical to buy tickets in bulk to create falsely inflated demand in order to drive up ticket prices to gain a larger return on what scalpers consider an "investment."  Buying a ticket with a bad faith intent to sell to another against the non-transferability clause in the contract that comes with every ticket you buy from Ticketmaster is not illegal in the sense that it is criminally culpable in California, though in other states this isn't true, but it is nonetheless a breach of contract. Capitalism thrives on enforceable promises in trade, not manipulated markets and broken contracts.  I argue, and many agree, that going to a festival like this is a gathering of people that enables many to feel free in a spiritual sense. This is not some material experience people are after--this is what church is for Christians for the die-hard fans of the bands that are playing this festival. Is this necessary to survive? No. Is this necessary for a happy existence? Apparently, yes, because people go to great lengths to travel to this festival, as well as many others, all in the name of enjoying music as its supposed to be enjoyed.  I am not sure putting up for auction a "one of a kind" item associated with a celebrity is analogous.
Confirming pink sheep- I ran into a couple while looking for wolves today.
Eee Pad Fratboy
Funny, all the decent people I know don't have inferiors.
http://video.google.com/videoplay?docid=-8025218193636377093#
Say a one year old redditor.
People don't play poker to be charitable, they play to make money. WSEX had rake free poker for a while but it was such a small, nitty player base it wasn't even worth playing there. All most people are going to care about is the size of the player base and game selection.   So no, I don't think it would be successful unless you had genius marketing and promotions. 
I don't own any ilk, but I can say for certainty that I always stick up for justice. You're making an emotional and invalid claim against my person. If I noticed a peasant being railroaded my conclusions would not change.   I'm not sure where some of you live that is so terrible, but I don't see it. 
Dent? yes he would have lost the entire hand
If no one buys a product (in other words if everyone views/uses it for free or pirates it), it will cease to exist. A movie cannot support itself on ad revenue and neither can anything else. Big productions like hollywood movies only exist because people buy them. If the movie industry loses enough revenue to piracy it will die, and we will be left with shitty youtube videos made by hobbyists and self absorbed cunts.   Likewise, if the game industry loses enough revenue to piracy the PC game industry will die, and we will be left with shitty freeware. It's people like you that ruin it for everyone else, you fucking stupid asshole.   Do you know why DRM exists? Because of fucking piracy. Do you know why publishers are just throwing half-assed ports at the PC market? Because they don't care anymore, they know we won't be a major part of their income, so why try to provide value to us?   Now I agree with pirates on one thing, and that is that DRM and other anti-piracy measures are the wrong way to go about this. Developers should be trying to offer value, convenience, and ease of use, instead of making it worse to use a legitimate product. Now let's get this clear, you can never, never, use that as justification for piracy. "Oh i'm not paying for DRM, i'll just pirate it." Are you fucking dumb? All you're doing is telling the company to give up on you next time and take their business somewhere else. Piracy is never justified, it is a criminal act that destroys the very entertainment industry that you are trying to rip off.  If you don't like what a company is doing with their product, then don't buy it. Don't pirate it either. Take your money that you should have if you want to use a luxury item like a video game or a movie and put it towards a company that makes quality games/movies/whatever, with no features withheld. /unorganized rant
You're digging in the wrong place. 
But why does that bother you? I'm sure there would be things in your wardrobe or in your past that you wore that people would less than appreciate. So, it just comes down to if you don't like it, don't look. But I can see your point. That, and there are some women who should just not wear them at all.
Always useful.
arr, that alot be scarin' me alot
IRONY! Y U NO RECOGNIZE IT?
wtf did you make me just read
Do you have a favorite? If there's something better, I'd love to see it
RSES  Their SAM's manuals are great.
I find this fascinating.... do you not own your own shoes?  How casual of a guy must you be to be sharing shoes with someone?   I can't tell if it's weird or cool.... LOL
If this is indicative of the type of work being done, I'm done with this interview.  If I wanted to get into compiler optimizations I would have gone into grad school.
My friend has one. My attitude towards HK not withstanding, it's a perfectly fine pistol. I wasn't too fond of how it felt, but that could just take some getting used to. 6/10
This made me laugh out loud, and cringe, I think you win.
The title is accurate. You are the dumbass.
i'm not gonna post my server ip cause i won't be able to handle it
My N64.  Brought it to college with me over my xbox 360.  So much win.
As a transfemminist, I actually find this helpful to women. Look at how stupid and over the top it is, full of bad jokes and running at an average speed of 60mph. It then applies the absolutely ridiculous view of women, but in the midst of everything else. It puts them on the same level. It says that the idea of women looking and acting like this is just as stupid as the rest of Duke Nukem. That's just my take anyway.
This story, I think, is over.  There's really nothing more to tell, unless Tim or Chris shows up on my doorstep, and I don't think that is very likely to happen.  That said, I have many more tales to tell, some fact, some fiction.  I will definitely be posting more.
Peggle.  I gave my grandmother Steam and gifted her a variety of different games (Plants vs. Zombies included), and she curses me for getting her addicted to Peggle.  It has begun.
Small meteors that have been partially disintegrated by  atmospheric friction usually have velocities that are similar to an object at free fall speed. The terminal velocity of a baseball is only about 95 miles an hour. That’s about the same speed a ball travels when thrown by a good fastball pitcher.  [source](http://curious.astro.cornell.edu/question.php?number=140)  Edit: You should check out the part about frost covered meteorites too!
haha i didn't know till it was explained to me...its so tiny and then it gets so big! ive told my girlfriends' because it is very important to know 
I've just had their [standard IPA](http://beeradvocate.com/beer/profile/220/916).  I might have had their Maximus, but I honestly can't remember.  Also, yeah, I tend to be pretty adventurous with my beer selections, but I figure it's always nice to have a hint in what direction to go.  I've been hitting a steady supply of awesome Beer bars here in LA, but aside from Pliny the younger sightings, I don't know what to be excited for.  Finally, thank you for the 'off the top of your head' recommendations.  I'll make it my mission to try to find, and taste, all of them.
She sounds delicious. 
I am some what aroused that many of the safe words suggested are food related.
I totally had this, upvote!
Is it common knowledge where she came from? I mean, do the vast majority of Americans know?
After that, imagine how many were wasted on World Of Warcraft. I DARE YOU.
I must not visit that site again - it stole a lot of time away from me.
Walter was seriously the only reason I started watching the show in the first place and didn't stop watching when they had those first couple excruciating episodes. Seriously, I was like, "Denethor? WTF?" and kept watching.  He is by far my favorite TV character right now. John Noble deserves a prize.
Lighter blew up on me once, was intense. Didn't burn my skin, just my hair. But Butane burns pretty quick, so. Would suck if it had something sticky that stuck to me like (what I'm assuming) happened in your case. o.o
What if he buys a sensible car, and just rents a u-haul whenever he wants to haul his bass boat?
I hate that guy.
that shits badass bro, kudos
&lt;iframe title="YouTube video player" width="480" height="390" src="http://www.youtube.com/embed/R_gxYPZgcrk" frameborder="0" allowfullscreen&gt;&lt;/iframe&gt;
You realize that money is just going to go to another state for the same purpose, right? So refusing it isn't going to save a thing? Just like refusing the high speed rail money. 
Hahahahaha.  Oh wait, you're serious.  Let me laugh even harder.  BAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHA.
Wow, man, you picked a winner there. I am now imagining the star-crossed lovers: a collective of malevolent aliens and an ambitious young astrobiologist.  They are so different, and yet, their love still unites them as one.
Yall postin in a troll thread.
Should of gone with somebody who is more oblivious to pranks like this - like a normal YouTuber - not a Redditor. This user/video of choice is a fail.
How much violent from potheads? 
Amazon UK says April 18th  [link](http://www.amazon.co.uk/Asus-EeePad-Transformer-Tablet-Android/dp/B004TB0EMK/ref=sr_1_1?ie=UTF8&amp;s=computers&amp;qid=1301615822&amp;sr=8-1)
Zardoz is social commentary about class struggle and the suffering of the common man and the use of "force" and propaganda to maintain social stratification but it also exposes the suffering of those at the top of the social scale, which is sorely lacking in most similar stories.   The Eternals represent the Western upper classes and they give guns and a God to the warrior class of Brutals called Exterminators in exchange of grains and control of the population. "The gun is good, the penis is evil" is a clear reference to Western preference of violence over compassion and life that encourages the lower classes fighting each other.   While the suffering of the Brutals, the common man, is clear in this arrangement the suffering of the upper classes, the Eternals, is also exposed in that they essentially lose their humanity by being so separated from their lower class counterparts. Essentially what is being stated is that Western style capitalism and class stratification separates all people from humanity and can only result in suffering for both top and bottom and that only when the "strong men" (be it laborers, law enforcement, military, or in this case the Exterminators) of the lower classes realize that they are in fact the weight that the upper classes are using to keep everyone down and rebel against it can all men be set free.   It's a fucking brilliant movie.
I agree, friends of mine lived on a Thai beach, LITERALLY ON the beach, in a small house/cottage for ~$10 dollars a day. Also, the English spoken there is impressive, and the food is amazing and cheap.  Just watch out for the lady boys. 
This comic is the perfect metaphor for what is wrong with that communist Obama.
[[citation needed]](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wikipedia:Citation_needed)
That's my whole point! The metric of "I can only watch this movie 233 times" is fucking stupid! But all rational thinking goes out the window in r/canada when the title has 'cap' or 'UBB' in it.
Interesting article and a genuine concern of mine as well.  One that ultimately drove me off of Facebook as well as a disinterested viewer of sites such as TechCrunch. Yes I understand that I will be in the minority but I agree with the dissenting view.  Anonymity is, at it's core, what the internet is about.  Just as in real life you have to deal with trolls.  Trying to eliminate this aspect is essentially trying to homogenize what you experience.  I prefer my life, and my internet surfing, with an element of danger.
Know that fittit is a pretty supportive place, and that we're here for you! 
I had one more idea but I'll probably have to save it for next year:  Insert white toner cartridge!  But then I'd start a website selling white toner cartridges on sale, then make a bunch of money.
Gold Jerry! Gold!
Why has nobody linked to this? (Hawken)  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=udEAEARD-Fo&amp;feature=player_embedded
forget the butt brick, [get Slimmy](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FUcZg938nK8)!
No.  Thank you!
D'oh! Didn'ty realize I had to equip armor :P. I'm going to run through the Character creator again, now that I've gone through once. When determining abilities, do you want us to use the point syustem or the array? I used my dice, they were calling me from the chest on the closet, they seemed to be antsy to get out. The PH suggested con for bards as secondary score so I took it's word for it.   Once I'm done I'll send the file to you, where should I do so?  I was planning to focus more healing as well as minoring in controlling a bit so that should be good.  btw; found a glitch in the creator. Bards get some rituals. I got a bunch and was able to sell them for hundreds of GPs, I'll make sure to be aware of that next time I go through. Am I supposed to buy the ritual books or does the character just get 2 to start?
OSU grad here. Woot for Oregon!
I hope I can make it this year! :D
Hold down while you do it and you'll walk away instead of starting the dialogue again.
Just feel the need to point out the rectangle in the bottom-right portion of the image that sure seems to be a hasty attempt to cover up a watermark.  I hope you found the image like this instead of trying to take creddit where none is due.
That was all my fault. I flanked got in good position and my squad spawned on me. I also didn't move on and continued to camp.  Guilty as charged. But I can't say I haven't been on the side of it either...
I tried this on my ex, she woke up and told me brush my teeth because I had morning breath. [](/okay)
Don't sweat it. I know how life can be. I just got two books from the library and I'm kind of busy with my side business, so I won't have time to read anything you send for a few weeks yet anyway. If you're really stuck on what to get, I promise not to judge you if you just go lazy and pick something you saw on my amazon list. And used books read the same as new books, so don't feel like you need to throw down a lot of cash, either.   Sorry to make the rest of you read this, but I don't know how to send a PM on the iPod app. 
Don't.
Statistically [](/lol)ble bla ble bler
Id much prefer a forum to this. And its [http://minecaftatlantis.forumotion.com/](http://minecaftatlantis.forumotion.com/) if you missed the link painless.
I'd like to show her how to herp, if you know what I mean
It's the best lubrication!
A good 75% of my girlfriends have told me it would be OK with them if I started having sex with them while they were asleep, one was wise enough to suggest some lube.  My point is, I think a good percentage of girls would be eager to have you eat them out while they are sleeping.
Thank you.
In Rudd's defence he did try as hard as he could. At the end of the day we are responsible for the upper and lower house members that voted it down.  We haven't convinced those in charge that we REALLY want this.  In some cases we haven't convinced them that climate change is a real issue (I'm looking at you, Tony).
An old lady who wouldn't keep her mouth shut during Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows Part 1 because she kept asking her daughter questions about what the fuck was going on. Had to move seats after asking her to keep it down several times. 
I see what you did there...
I think the Indians got it right in ancient times.
"Science is what you know, Philosophy is what you don't know."  -Bertrand Russell
I'm bored, sorry.
If you need anything at all, feel free to contact me via private message or whatever. I'm willing to chat at length about process and there isn't much I can't answer. I just love brewing and talking about it helps me, too. 
always liked cream sickles - vanilla vodka and orange soda jack and coke is a good one as well, as is jameson and gingerale  remember, beer gets you drunk faster, so if you're taking that route, drink slower or alternate in non-alcoholic drinks.  also, don't drink beer, then hard liquor. fast way to get sick
Excuse me, my gentlefellow, but your dish seems to be without, The Bacon!
Work for the Dole was never very good at getting people jobs. It was less effective than the Labor Breaking the cycle plan, and more expensive. 
I've never understood any type of underwear besides bikinis, hip huggers, or something with a crotch. If you're wearing anything that even slightly resembles string or less, what's the point? Just don't wear underwear.
you are right with your calculations as far as i can tell. That does not mean that your body fat % is correct however. have you tried a skin fold caliper?
i'm guessing it works as designed.  the act of dieing seems to be a spell interrupt.  once dead, you can 'continue casting spells'
Thanks for explaining the joke to a non-caffeine.....ingester? 
Gaah, shoot them before they start making T100s.
He called beer "nerdy gay shit".
 Good choice. I find the cruller to be the superior donut (if it is still classed as one).
i live in santa clara california and this exact sign is on my way to school every day. except our local prophets are having a meeting to discuss it in april!!! yaaaay!!! ill be sure to attend and give a progress report. 
about € 25 per month, I've choosen the smallest plan which gets me:   * internet flat (capped to 64kb/s after the first 300 mb)   * 30 free calling mins are included   * on weekends, calls to all landlines and mobile phones of my carrier are free   * a landline number when I'm at home with the phone (including cheaper calls for me and people who call me on that number)   * 30 gigs storage for documents/music and 100 gigs free traffic per month (like dropbox but coming from my provider so it's really fast) no sms flat included though, but I don't text a lot.   
The women liking pink hypothesis always makes me giggle because not so long ago it was thought to be a colour for boys (and light blue for girls).  Which like much of the rest of evo psych stuff is just trying to make up convenient silly explanation for socialized behaviours.  Actual properly done scientific studies I would consider--most of what gets posted as evo psych is not.
no justice no peace tabarnak
Next Sam Hill right there
I hope you're trolling
It's channeled.  If you die it stops the channel.  If you get stunned it stops the channel.  Knock-up, silence, and suppress will stop the channel.  Root might also.  If you want to make sure you get it off, do it after you die or be away from the fight.
Well played, Mr. Andretti. ;) Just let me get around grandma without feeling like I'm going to be rammed into a ditch, and I'll vacate that left lane ASAP.  And thanks for introducing me to the concept of Rechtsfahren, now I know the name for the manner in which I drive.  (this is where I do the internet version of the little wave of acknowledgement in the rear view)
I had a feeling when I saw the title... but I'm still so disappointed :(
It's a book written about FDR and Pearl Harbor that ~~insinuates~~ flat out says that FDR knew the Japanese were going to attack and let the attack happen anyway.
you may fool everybody else but you wont fool [me](http://i3.photobucket.com/albums/y68/punkinshoe/seentit.jpg).
I run and mountain bike. I also do those things for fun. So I'm always a winner.
It took me and my best friend a few months to realize his job and my school were across the street from one another.   [](/fy1)  Lunches with best friends
well played sir
I came here to post this. White Russians contain a lot of alcohol but you can't tell from the taste (well at least how I make them, around 4 shots of alcohol and a splash of cream). A good few of my friends who don't drink much have joined me in a night of these and cursed me for weeks after.   Also I would say ignore the coke, sounds awful :P
The only reason not to fast forward through the intro... Have to make sure her name is still there.
Was he playing on Lotus Clan?
&gt;&gt;If they didn't pray, then God would not cure the cancer, and just let that person die. &gt;What a self centered jerk.  If you look at things logically than yes, Yahweh is a jerk.  But the real purpose of the prayer is not that it will make a damn bit of difference, it is to make you feel better and more in control than you really are.
E-EYE-E-OHHHHH!!!
The whole reason I never raped and murdered a girl in 1990 is that I didn't want to turn out like Glenn Beck.
No, it wasn't. And just in case we forgot who [David Barton](http://www.publiceye.org/ifas/fw/9606/barton.html) is, he's the nominal head of Glenn Beck's [Black-Robed Regiment](http://mediamatters.org/mmtv/201007070067).
geraffes are so dumb.
Patch 1.3.1 notes... 
Awesome.  I think I want to adopt you.  "And to Leg I bequeath my laptop - to which he is assigned a task known only to him for a purpose not to be shared until I have been dead for one hundred years"   haha
I have a few scars on my left front shin.  In high school I had a Honda VFR700F Interceptor (crotch rocket if that means nothing to you) (motorcycle if THAT means nothing to you) and it was Junior-Senior cut day, the friday before Junior-Senior weekend when all juniors and seniors were supposed to go to Myrtle Beach and be hooligans, basically.  So having some spendable assets I decided to go look into getting a neon kit for my bike, so that I could stand out more on the Strip in myrtle beach and maybe entice the lovely girlies into getting on my bike and pressing up against me. I was into that. (Still am, but no bike at the moment.)  I hit the bike shop but they didn't have anything in stock, so I decided to head back home. This was a 5 lane major town-type highway, heavily commercial. Two lanes on each side and an empty media for turning purposes. I saw a big white custom conversion van, the kind with captains chairs and tvs in the back, waiting to make a left turn out of the goodwill that was up the road on my right side. I.E., she intended to turn across my lane. Being wary of this sort of thing, I paid special attention to her as I got closer and watched her as she looked for an opening.  She looks left and looks right at me, and we make eye contact. I'm looking right into her eyes.   "Ok, she sees me, good for her."  Then she pulls right the fuck out in front of me, when I'm really close, doing 45 in a 45. I try to steer away from her into the median (I was in the fast lane) but she's still pulling out. Finally I realize this is hopeless and I can either clip the front corner of the bumper and spin off who knows how, or I can man up and ride into the nice fat quarter panel, grabbing as much brake as I can in the process.  Well, plan probably would have worked ok if I was further than the estimated 20 feet or so away when I made that decision. I straightened up and then got on the brakes hard, but not hard enough to lock either tire up.  Remember I said conversion van. This one had those huge industrial construction sidemirrors that are bolted on with big ass bolts and are basically a huge flat bar of metal supporting a huge mirror. When I hit the van, I catapulted off the bike, with my left leg smashing the windscreen and then dragging through the sharp bits left, which is where the 'stitches' come in. My chest slammed into that fucking mirror, and I had to be doing 35 or better still, at that point.  At this point, or right before, she had slammed on the brakes, so she was squarely in the fast lane that I had been traveling in. I bounce off that Mark II War Mirror, aaaaaaall the way across the median, into incoming traffic. I have the strength to realize the asphalt is like 3000 degrees Kelvin and I lift my head looking around to see if maybe I can crawl somewhere cool (that was my first reaction - not "Oh that bitch" or "Oh hey I'm hurt", no, it was "Wow this street is really hot.") and that's when I notice the cars bearing down on me. So I do a kind of hasty panicked reverse crab walk into the median and then just collapse. DONE, NOT MOVING ANY MORE.  She has the decency to not drive off. I don't remember what she said, but I remember just a second or two later the guy I had just talked to at the bike shop is like "WOW MAN ARE YOU OK I SAW THE WHOLE THING" so he ends up talking to the cop and telling him what happened, and I don't get a ticket from being out of it and not being able to present my side of the story. I did hear that bitch say something like "He came out of nowhere and he was going really fast!" but the bike shop guy shut that down.  So this is also the story of my first ambulance ride. Pro tip: Avoid this ride if you can, and DEFINITELY don't ever get in one if you're hurt. The EMT in the back with me was trying to get an IV into me, the shocks on this thing were War Shocks Mark III, super stiff. I was bouncing all around, and honestly, I missed the 3000 degree Kelvin asphalt at this point.  Finally get to the hospital, get a bunch of xrays and cat scans and whatnot, get lots of stitches and bandages, etc.  Days later I'm at the insurance agency, good old State Farm, filling out my claim and she's like "We're not paying, the other drive says it's your fault."  Wat.  I turned even more black and purple than I already was. "**She** pulled out in front of **me**, I got no ticket, and I don't know if she did on account of, you know, **the fucking ambulance ride** and all, but this is totally not my fucking fault and if you're not paying this claim **and then some** I'm gonna find the sleaziest sheisteriest lawyer in Charleston SC and have you guys buy me a HOUSE."  Because all I originally claimed for was medical bills and my bike. No lost wages, no pain and suffering, just what I had directly lost. Apparently she reconsidered and found my original claim fair because I walked out with a check.  And then I bought a CBR600 a few days later by walking in the dealership and writing a check for it like a boss. And then a few months later another fucking white van rear ended me at a stop sign, totaling it, but that's a different story.  **tl;dr:** no. fuck you. that took me forever to type.
Upvoted for "faces," and for general helpfulness.
My job sucks because - Completely, horrendously, unimaginably bad administration. Though they are otherwise good co-workers I have absolutely nothing in common with them. It's in a jail so the walls are all gray or olive drab, there are few windows with none in my "office", most of the occupants are not in good moods, and it smells like body odor to one degree or another on almost every floor. We aren't allowed to bring much into the building.  No personal electronics.  Nothing made out of metal (even drink cans), no containers that can't be seen through or x-rayed, and more.  You pass through metal detectors and x-rays (your stuff) to get in the door.  You have random searching (if they bother). The inmates in general are more literate than the officers... It's hard to imagine really.  Sorry, it's been exceptionally bad for a while now. 
I'm going to LMAO when private Islamic schools are going to take advantage of this. It's funny how Christians fundamentals are giving Muslim fundamentalists a foothold in American society.  
Where have you been man I've missed you so much Listen bro if yhou don't get more active I will have to make joke explainer 2 and take your job because the community needs a person like you to be ACTIVE
YOU'RE NOT GETTING THE POINT IGNORAMUS
Idk why there cant just be a simple 'yes' or 'no' selection.
Well it's working.  So keep it up.
The same thing was said about many places thousands of years ago, less places hundreds of years ago, there is no telling what advances we'll make that will allow us to live in even more extreme climates.
I panicked, and I specifically remember thinking that if I plugged the headphones back in that the sound might not stop - I've have problems on the laptop before where it simply doesn't recognize that the headphones are plugged in. I guess my reactionary brain figured it would be a waste of precious seconds and I should go straight for the mute button (which probably was just as fast, anyway).
Translation: "I'm too busy to talk to you because I'm ordering/buying stuff to keep up with the latest bullshit ideas our bosses drew on a whiteboard"
Yep
[:..(]
Uh atheism would would be the BIOS because they wouldnt believe in an OS.
Also tie her up with your web
1. Stock castle with every device money can buy 1. Troll hotel lobby for prince 1. Grind
some soothing synth drums to cheer us all up.
Haha
wow, you have really soft looking hands.  Are you a girl?
There was a thread a few days ago about how Reddit should choose some random youtube video to make famous for April Fools (for no reason, of course). Turns out this is the one.  I'm only explaining it because I feel jilted by that inane "scooping ice cream" video posted a few weeks ago.
You are trying to get very thin for 5'8 (I am 5'7 and that is below my goal weight).  What are your actual lifts? I wouldn't normally ask, but they will enlighten us as to whether you are actually strong or not - 'small frame is a very broad term'. You really might need more muscle on you.  To be honest from the tone of your post you seem borderline anorexic.
Is it weird that I read that whole article mentally in his voice?
I need to get some of these. By brothers kid (now in high school) at one point put bologna in every CD/DVD tray in the house.
He's a beast but he can't do it himself forever.
Canadian Football League Arena Football League NFL Europe... I can't really think of any other strictly football Semi-pro leagues
I'm surprised; couldn't someone just use the Photoshop "make it more better" filter?
Likening someone to an ape is, indeed, classy.  Well done.
... and never will have it.
Great work guys. So was this a class assignment or a hobby? Where did you learn to weld big fella? 
You also spelled spelled accidentally wrong.
When you mistake your girlfriends jeans for your own you know your own jeans are a tad on the tight side.
&gt;I grew up in a family riddled with divorce, substance abuse, mental illness, crime, early death, incest, financial, physical and emotional distress.  Although I'm not male, I have this kind of family.  I now have 2 sons.  I look at my in-laws for inspiration on how to be a good/loving/supportive parent.  You and I both know what a bad parent is, so we know what to avoid.  Just because we didn't experience a normal family growing up doesn't mean we can't be kick ass parents.
That movie gave me nightmares.
Or learn Vim, which is very useful (depending on the type of job OP may have.)
The only thing that stumbleupon brings me to anymore is old chain emails like the ones that my dear old nana used to send me before I blocked her. 
I'm honestly not trolling you... but why not?  If someone says something stupid or annoying, I click "down".
Why is the number of views still 303 while likes crossed 7000??
no - it is not correct to assume that because there are two possible outcomes, that they are equally likely
shut up asshole..
True. But for $16?   How about this: it's the best bottle of bourbon under $20.
I'm actually getting Giclee prints made in a week or two. I have some samples waiting for me when I get off work but I'm a little worried because the picture the shop sent me [looks a little washed out](http://i.imgur.com/N686T.jpg) to me compared to the one I posted that I took with my point and shoot.  Send me a PM or something and I'll let you know when I get it all sorted out.
http://cdn.gotraffic.net/downloads/30110331_fed_release_documents.zip
Trollmom!
nice ass.  more light.
Sig P226. asking $550.
I thought the answer would be *by cell phone*.
As I previously said, 'not all are designed' is not the same as 'none are designed'. Some are. This experiment was. I wasn't.   It's true, no one has yet observed the spontaneous generation of life. However, we have observed the spontaneous generation of the parts needed to generate life. We have yet to observe any divine creation, however, in any way, shape, or form.  Also, I'm still waiting for links to your 'evidence'.   PS. Can we keep this in one thread before it splinters further?
Depends, If i haven't had a smoke in a while, ill have a cigarette. If i've had a cig in the past week, ill meditate instead. just put on some Explosions in the Sky, lay down, think about nothing, and drift away.   
noted. Thanks!
And the Red Panda!
I mean, it is the basis for your requirements to graduate, which cannot be changed.
Cosign. 
I agree people often think they want/know they should want something different from what they actually go for. However, how you present yourself has a lot to do with it too and I'm sure on average a "thin good looking guy" has more self confidence (for whatever reason) than a "hilarious but chubby dude." 
I like me :(
I know! Lets put "BREAKING:" in the title of any real important stories!
Alright, I'm working on it.
bad graphics? ever heard of crysis? yeah they compare two games that are obviously not anywhere close the same level... 
5th amendment protects you unless there is a good samaritan law in your state.
Hi from the Royals
But you are yelling at me over the internet. u mad
Don't apply logic. The guy is clearly a fucking idiot. 
FOOLS!  This is a Mario Party scar from spinning the analog stick too quickly!
Check out these Turtle Beaches, I have a pair of Turtle Beaches for my xbox and they work great and are relatively cheap.  http://www.turtlebeach.com/products/pc-gaming-headsets/ear-force-z2.aspx  Edit: One thing to keep in mind, you are not likely to get a headset with real surround sound in your price range unless you find a pair second hand.
If you live in the SW area ( by the PSU campus) you get to enjoy both nature and the city. The NW area is really nice too but it's a bit pricey. You could also live in the west hills and commute downtown. The thing I like about living in Portland is that you're never too far away from downtown. We also have a really great transportation system.
seems like this whole thread of people jumping on the attack fail to realize that our military does not just shoot guns.  my proudest moment is when i was flying humanitarian aid missions into Bangladesh after they got destroyed by a tsunami in 06. if we had no military who is to say we would stay a nation?  just  b/c life is stable now in the US doesn't mean that another country wont get the crazy itch to attack, then what will you guys say?  a nation as big as ours with so many enemies can not stay a nation without a military.  yes, i think its stupid that we went off the gold standard and started backing our currency up with military power....but fuck, we got the military power to do that so no body is trying to invade. the brainwashing thing can go both ways, in my few years at college Ive noticed that most of the professors are anti-war and thus anti-military.  can i now say that all you guys that disagree with people joining the military b/c the men and women who joined and sacrificed their lives are brainwashed? and quote "YOU'RE ALPHA AS FUCK, BRO!"  i couldn't hear you, could you type louder?  thanks bro! its a damn good thing there are people who will always be willing to join the service for whatever goal/reason behind it with the gamble of not coming out at the end of the contract.  defending freedom, humanitarian aid, civil service, whatever the reason, its not something that should be looked down on.   but, as dumb as i am, this will be my last post on the subject b/c you know what they say about arguing on the internet...  GO HIVE MIND!!!!  
Equilibrium
I was looking for something like this as well :/
because fuck you that's why. FTFY.
Wait, so she just picked up a random shirt that she saw as she walked in and smelled it?
I agree with you. thanks for your insight I do appreciate it.
How do you know so much when everyone else in the world knows so little? You should feel sorry for yourself, Buddy. Cause honestly, when people have an immature mindset like yourself, they don't get too far in life. So have fun feeling sorry for everyone else who cares about a quality life and have fun regretting yours on your death bed. Mark my words tough guy. 
Sorry if I offended, but I honestly didn't think her character was that well written (a little heavy handed really) and not very well acted.   And seriously, just answer when someone calls your name instead of wasting 30 seconds of screen time staring at the camera/off into space. There are other ways of establishing a characters emotions. 
My pranks usually involve me telling the prankee what the prank was afterwards. So I thought I'd tell him, now that he's experienced the prank. Maybe I'm doing it wrong... :/
100%
Really really great of trion to do this. I also got this email, completely unexpected (account was hacked, took around 10 days~). I got my stuff back and they gave me and ingame pet. I really thought that was it and I was happy with that, but... wow &lt;3 trion.
Forever paranoid *sigh*
Congrats! A lot of this looks really cool, the only problem is I have noooo idea what the movie is even slightly about from the trailer.  Hell, I like a little surprise when I step into the theater, but it seems like bad marketing when you consider most people. Just my take.  This, of course, is not your problem-- you're just a kickass actor who's out there kicking ass. Carry on, sir!
The FairTax is a libertarian pipe dream that doesn't actually add up or even begin to be feasible.  http://www.factcheck.org/taxes/unspinning_the_fairtax.html
But google having analytics on the majority* of website, they may be able to detect people trying to game the system better.   *Citation needed but the point is that they are on a lot of website
Wicked, thanks dude!
While they're on their 12th beer, I'll be on my 12th 151 in Coke.
It's a free download nowadays.  Someone released a 1.40 patch a few years ago that brings hardware rendering to windowed mode and some new keybinds.  To be honest, I prefer the original client but as sometimes stream my playing on justin.tv, i need to use 1.40.  You can download it [here](http://pushbiscuit.info/index.php?option=com_content&amp;view=category&amp;layout=blog&amp;id=38&amp;Itemid=77).
Try asking on /wg/?  Enjoy your ban. (In theory, requests on boards other than /r/ is a bannable offense)
that is amazing!! I'm using that from now on!
Certainly sounds like it, and I think the captain was Nick Frost, so he's probably been seen with Simon Pegg in Shaun of the Dead, Hot Fuzz, Spaced etc.
Holy crap, awesome! I've been meaning to reread Infinite Jest, it's one of my favorite books ever. I'll join you, but I do have a bunch of other reading obligations so I don't know if I'll finish by the end of April.
beautiful work.
You should be paranoid man. Every time you make a phone call, it's monitored. Every time you send a text message, it is reviewed.   Your movements are tracked via your cell phone. Your purchases, rentals, and more are tracked via your credit card and store club cards.  Man, you should be paranoid. The second you stop, then you're just like everyone else. Living life day to day, hardly aware of reality. Most people are probably not even self-aware. So what I think you need to do, is instead of getting drugs to zombifie yourself, start occupying your mind with other things.   Code some apps, go fishing, read a book. You have options but if you dwell and start medicating or even self-medicating you're not fixing anything. It really is just your attitude, all in your head.
[Mechwarrior 4:Mercs](http://www.mektek.net/projects/mw4/) is free.  So that seems like a good place to start.
&gt;why don't you get guns?  Gun control is pretty common in Africa.   Law-abiding people can't have them, for the most part.
And here comes April fools day...
The third video has a 'Ghosts N Stuff' feel to it.  Love it!
South Korea was part of the cold war (Kim Il Sung even asked Stalin for permission to invade). Afghanistan Part 1 was part of the color war. What makes it a 'cold war' is that neither superpower directly faced one another, but rather had wars-by-proxy.
Yes, some of the wishes are sad.  I wish I could just snap my fingers and make it better for them.  It is amazing how saying or writing can make it a bit better though.  
This is, of course, why Prop 19 failed to pass.
Why would you make your username that and repost his shit?
my thank you is just more for the link to the more informing discussion, though i realized their is a another discussion box at the top that also link to it.
Ditto!
k.. kyle?
twist: They already knew each other before this thread and planned the whole thing.
Typical Florida commute.
I was not always fast until high school where I began doing CC, I enjoyed doing that so I just kept running in my free time and I got to where I am now.  It's funny because I was never offered a scholarship, I was actually a walk-on!!! But I do get treated better in terms of academics because all of my classes are revolved around my athletic schedule, and the profs really take that into account! But if you work hard then you too can be a athlete at some school!!
Exactly!
Damn. I thought the HDMI feature was going to be a killer. I must buy a tablet by end of April, what is your opinion?
F that homie. Weak reasoning. Move on! She's not worth it.
Yeah, I had the thought that one of them learned it from the other, but...I don't know, the interpersonal dynamics between them are not really that way. More like one wouldn't do it that way if she saw the other doing it.  I don't expect anyone to cop to this unless it actually is considered Best Practice somewhere somehow.  I really just wondered if anyone else has seen it in action.
The best [optical microscope](http://news.cnet.com/8301-27083_3-20038441-247.html) currently has a resolution of around ~50 nanometers. (Check out the link, truly incredible. But don't even dare asking* about evanescent waves, I've no idea what are those!) [Here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Atomic_de_Broglie_microscope)'s a very strange concept of detecting very small things, it's good for about ~1 nanometer.  Now check [this](http://zomg.hu/universe/) out and you'll see how small an electron is. (Though be advised, it's not 100% scientifically correct, for example String Theory is currently just a nice model without (any?) experimental data to back it up.)  As others already said in the comments *seeing* involves light, especially visible light, which involves photons with ~400-800 nm wavelength. (At 400 nanometer a photon has about 3.1 eV kinetic energy, and it has a frequency of ~750 THz.) So when there's an electron, just chillin', and comes a photon and they do a nice [Compton scattering](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Compton_scattering "the electron absorbs and emits a photon, basically deflecting one and exchanging momentum with it") the formula gives that (if the photon bounces back) [it loses some energy](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=h+%2F+%28m_e*c%29+*+%28+1+-+cos+pi+%29+%2B+400+nm&amp;a=UnitClash_*c.*LightSpeedUnits.dflt--&amp;a=UnitClash_*h.*PlanckConstantValue--&amp;a=UnitClash_*m!_e.*ElectronMasses.dflt--) (because it's wavelength increases, so it's frequency decreases.)   Here's the [experiment](http://www.physorg.com/news122897584.html) with attosecond laser pulses. The technical paper has the juicy [details](http://arxiv.org/abs/0708.1060): they used 24 eV extreme ultraviolet laser pulses to excite the atom and produce an ion (decouple an electron from it, then accelerate it to go round and round the ion), they used an other laser to guide the electron back to the ion (or something), the lasers were synchronized, plus the serious magic is timing these pulses so that the created electron wave packets interfere constructively (precisely, they became coherent, so you get one electron with double the "energy" -- the timing was calculated with the Time-dependent Schroedinger Equation). Basically they used so small pulses that the ion doesn't get blasted even the laser's [intensity](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=%28%285+*+10^12+W%2Fcm^2%29+%2F+24+eV%29+*+300+attosecond++*+1+nm^2) was 5*10^12 W/cm^2. (So it gives ~4 photons for each square nanometer per second. We know it's per second because Watts is Joules/second.)  Oh, and don't forget, that the more energy something has, the more smaller it can be. (I don't know *why* nature is this way, but the Heisenberg Uncertainty Principle describes this phenomenon besides the somewhat intuitive observational limit thing.) So that why some clever folks try to use helium atoms for probing things, because those are big and fuzzy, and peaceful guys with relatively low energy.  \* Please do!
Yeah that is a good ping time.  If your NAT is open and you have your search criteria set to local only, then you shouldn't have a problem most games.
Thank you kind sir.
Spite. The answer is always spite.
Exact. J'ai très brièvement enseigné le français à des jeunes (niveau secondaire) au Mexique... Les cours de français leur étaient imposés, et après 2 ans de cours, ils ne pouvaient même pas répondre à un simple "Ça va?". Mais quelle perte de temps!   J'ai pour avis que l'enseignement d'une langue étrangère ne devrait pas être imposée, du moins pas avant un âge où l'enfant serait conscient de ce qu'il apprend et de ce que cela pourrait lui rapporter. Et encore là, ce devrait être un choix, motivé par un intérêt ou une curiosité envers la langue et la culture... 
Whoooo cares
It's sad that this is news. Doing something like that is called being a decent fucking human being. Grrrr. Don't give me a 'when I was raised' moment, Reddit, I'm only 23.
http://www.discogs.com/artist/Wuthering+Heights
It has been shown to enhance short-term memory, ameliorate deficits in long-term memory and it's an all round good metabolic booster with anti-inflammatory properties.
Football teams for bowl division and division 1 schools are investments. Yes the head coach gets paid a very very high paycheck, but his team brings in more money than any academic department at the university. Revenue for advertising, free TV air time, multi million dollar deals for the broadcasting rights for the games... it's millions and millions for the university. College football pays for scholarships of non athletes.
Given that at most schools, it's insanely easy for underage students to sneak alcohol into the dorms, this isn't saying much.  One time, I just carried it in uncloaked.  And yes, I was underage at the time.
Hopefully no one :O Hence the point that it's a macro that's not a shortcut for any reasonable person.
Fuck my retainer, fuck it seriously. Doesn't even fit anymore. 
most of those were instant, I didnt really see that it had some rebates. I still dont know I just wanted to know if all the parts worked together and if it would be good for gaming 
Well, I'm not just blindly assuming this. Give me a moment to track down my source.  Edit: http://www.anandtech.com/show/3912/boxee-box-the-inside-story/2  http://smartphonebenchmarks.com/forum/index.php?/topic/85-nvidia-tegra-2-tegra-250-dual-core-processor-smartphones-are-they-going-to-be-fast/  http://tegradeveloper.nvidia.com/tegra/forum/h264-decoder-limits-t20tegra-250
Wicked, Thanks!
In fact be aware that I am watching you, watching him post from the Terrace *fishy face*
Oh, nice, I did a search for One Sweet Day, and it popped up with a cover by Lisa Lavie. As soon as I saw the name I knew it. I guess the double 'L' name is how I was thinking leona lewis. Thanks!
source: http://english.aljazeera.net/mritems/imagecache/318/480/mritems/Images/2011/3/31/2011331141910748965_20.jpg
[](/troll "I'm not interested in other girls but I'll keep bugging her about letting me fuck other girls with her.")
I messaged them!  I know they're a C/A user because I've talked to them in the chat before.
EEEEEEEWWWWWW! Human anatomy playing a key role in the only form of sexual reproduction naturally capable by humans!? Gross!
Right... I'm retarded. True story.
For the problem of users mentioning reddit in the youtube comments, I recommend using RES to tag them on reddit, then downvote the snot out of them for a while. 
Yep.  Pretty sure that was them.  My buddy and I just sat there and drank our beer.  I forgot how expensive ballpark beer is though.  Ughhhh...
Every year on April Fool's I tell my dad I'm pregnant and every year he calls me and says, "Is it true?!...Wait...Is today...? Fuck." And then hangs up. Works a charm. Four years today, still going strong.
Reign Over Me
Charge them money for the answer.  They'll stop asking you or pay you for your time.  
Whoa, check it out at 480p! The video quality increase really shows off the care and craft that went into this video.
I don't really have a problem with the top 3. McCartney is my personal favorite bass player, but the Ox is a pretty universal pick for best of all time. 
This is America, where we love and respect violence, and hate and fear sex. That's what happens when you're colonized by Puritans.
i just did it for you pal :)
Thank you for this!
why would I capitalize and punctuate in the middle of a sentence?  Pretty. much, wards are Pretty. good
ya
seems cool dawg
i like Sens http://www.teamliquid.net/tlpd/sc2-international/players/1176_FF%20You%20See%3F%3F
I think it's doable.
My pick for one of the April Fool's videos.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=I3jxgGunUSg  Great on so many levels.
Reminds me of the dorms at the [University at Buffalo](http://imgur.com/P7BcV).
Isn't that one guy wearing the wrong style hat?
We're gentlemen.  We only shoot our robots in the back while they're trying to escape.
seriously downloading songs right now. 
i love dogs
What a shame.
I can promise you he's with some awesome kitties now, havin a blast :) Given that she's maryjane it seems only logical that she'll meet supper (my departed feline friend)
I have. His presentation/seminar was outstanding.
It sounds like you let her "convince you" to get engaged. Three years isn't an engagement, it is conning your girlfriend into staying with you so you don't have any risk in the relationship.  Either you are insecure and afraid she will leave, or don't want to get married and are giving her just enough of what she wants to stay with you, while keeping any actual commitment conveniently out of reach.
One should not seek the wisdom of a Zen master if they are not prepared to be trolled.
It's a very passive aggressive way of suggesting Blizzard to nerf more units.  "Look, guys, we're testing out the marines. Not every units, just marines. Now, now, wait, we're not trying to say anything about imbalance or nerfs. We're just testing how effective the marine is against other units, for you know, science and stuff."  Give me a break.
I broke my arm by falling off a table. See, my family has this weird curse, every time there's a holiday of some sort (usually New Year's eve) something bad happens to one of the family members (health-wise)--my brother was hospitalised twice, I believe my mum was hospitalised once and most of us come down with severe fever during that day. That particular year was my turn, I suppose. Anyway, I was six years old and my dad bought me one of those guns that shoots arrows that stick to surfaces, I was sitting on a table and looking in the mirror in the hall, trying to aim for my heart in the reflection (I was a strange kid) and lost balance. The whole time I was "falling" (which was a second, but obviously because of the adrenaline it felt like hours) I was trying to remember how to break the fall (I was a girl who liked to play-fight with little boys, fighting was a huge part of my playtime, so my parents taught me how to properly do it).. and of course I did exactly the opposite of what I was supposed to do. I fell off with my arm completely straight and hyper-extended, I broke it almost completely, literally only 1mm was holding it together and I was almost hospitalised, because doctors didn't think that it would grow back together properly if I was at home. The break was amazingly clean, basically a straight line on the x-rays. I have a bone-phobia ever since, which doesn't help me, considering I'm a biomedical science student and I plan to do post-grad medicine.  I've broken my toes several times by running into a door. Lots of people say they're clumsy, but they have no idea what clumsy means until they meet me. Most of my friends say that I take clumsiness to a whole new level and they're surprised I've managed to stay alive for as long as I have.  Not an awesome story, more like terrible, but since I liked to play-fight as a kid, I once had my toe broken my three guys (two of them were holding me and trying to keep me from moving) and one jumped on my foot, breaking my little toe. I had it coming I suppose, but three against one was unfair and I was three years younger. I was also once thrown into a wall by those same guys and I blacked out and had a minor concussion, because when I woke up I was really confused and didn't remember fighting at all.
Where do you go to undergrad and law school?  What was your first job out of law school? What is your hrly rate? How much do you give to charity every year? What is your actual take home pay? How many attorneys does Monsanto keep on retainer? Do you get profit sharing?
Wild Wild West. It's bad, but it's not that bad. Plus it has the giant metal spider!
&gt;  Women and their holes are built to pleasure men or for men to profit from them.   You virgins are soooo easy to spot!  Like shooting ducks in a barrel. 
PLEASE INSERT COIN
You made me laugh so hard I had trouble clicking the upvote button.
Ah, I could see that. 
this reply needs alot more attention.
Mods, just add a relevant line of MathJax.  No need to install anything, works for all browsers. Just add a line or two of JS to the top of the page [if possible].  http://www.mathjax.org/docs/1.1/start.html#mathjax-cdn
Ignorant people have always thought this. Ignorant people aren't going away.   
This makes me want to watch all 3 movies again... damnit I just started work!
By people who were just in it for the tax exemption. 
makeup) seems oddly overrepresented, as if the training set was extremely small.
Ew.
Everyone who has accessed this site using your Iphone, I now have your number and you will be prosecuted to the fullest extent.  If you don't own an Iphone, you're obviously poor and I don't give a shit about suing you.
i've never seen an organic crater before ...
Assuming that that person would lovingly care for the dog, I'd say about 10 grand on top of whatever small debt I have (student loans, credit cards etc. ).   That sounds harsh but that much money is enough to get another dog, live debt free (for a while) and buy some shiny things.   I'm sure there's people in worse financial conditions that'd settle for less.   Before people attack me: Yes I love my dog. But I understand that we will part ways at some point and if someone stacks a large sum of cash in front of me, I would trade him in. 
I actually kind of overlooked the diesel part haha, you're right that they don't need ignition to _keep_ running.  It'll be damn hard to get started without glow plugs though.
You sir get an upvote
Very nice, are you planning a more revealing shot (bit like the zombie shirt)?
Because if you look at the way the driver area deformed it was from the entire front of the car getting crumpled (and not giving way).  If the chassis of the car was badly damaged it would have acted more like a modern crumple zone.  In both cases the driver would have almost certainly died, but from the shots I saw it seemed the car held up (i.e., it wasn't completely rusted).
First off, if any professional; doctor, counselor, psychologist, psychiatrist, etc.  If any of these people laugh at you for feeling depression, they are not in the right lines of work.  OP, I went through a 2 year depression and it was hard.  I went to see a psychologist, under my own power and decision.  Depression is not a uncommon occurrence in anyone, teenager, adult, male or female.  However, do yourself a favor and do NOT diagnose yourself.  Let me reiterate this information.  **Do not diagnose yourself**  Talk to your parents, if you can.  If you're going to school, go to the nurse and ask to speak with a counselor.  If you do not want to speak to the school counselor then ask them for a suggestion to speak to one out of school.  You're not alone, never feel alone.  I hope this helps and cheers.
CIRCLEJERK NOW!
Totally clicked on this thinking it was a joke.....buzz kill
...I never get service and I've been waiting a long time for a white one. 
Scumbag crave:  Come play more minecraft mikal  *takes down minecraft server*  edit: &lt;3&lt;3&lt;3 you know i kid
Actually, that's not what you said.  I'll give you a chance to click back through *exactly* what you said before I copypasta that same stuff here for you to review.
I thought that [song](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9H-bJs-Ib-s) was about a dude.
Goats! What is it you are doing!? You don't belong up there, goats.
Would make sense. Although foot wide crater you'd think it would have ripped the hand off clean. I guess it just bounced off instead of actually hitting it straight on. 
No.
For me, my year is kind of split into 2 "seasons". I bike race/run race/tri race, so from about march to september/october, I only lift about 3 days every 2 weeks. But am running or cycling or swimming 6 days per week. The volume ramps up slowly during the season till my peak race months of august and september.  Come october, I lighten the load and get into the gym 6 times every two weeks. I add squats and dead lifts to my gym routines here, leaving them out during the racing months as it kind fucks things up if I try both.  It's a weird schedule and it's constantly changing, but I keeps me from doing the same thing all the time, it's always refreshing.
any chance of a better photo?  maybe nude?
Do your writers sign standard non-disclosure employment agreements, or sell you their rights, or both? 
ಠ_ಠ
I love it when people blatantly ignore sentences they know are true and have no real response to by attempting to flame the structure of the sentence.  Also a nice attempt to trivialize what I was talking about but no, I do not think these things are what reddit likes but clearly you don't have a clue about what this site is about at all.   You list the things that are out of your control as some sort of demon. Instead you don't understand that people can like what ever the fuck they want, just because it doesn't mirror what YOU like means absolutely nothing apart from you cant appreciate other peoples input which although sometimes provides quite trivial input, almost always provides insightful, interesting and engaging conversation in the end.  memes are an unavoidable part of everyday life, go and actually research what a meme (no not "know your meme, [this](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Meme)) is then you can properly understand their place on a site like this and why they occur, then perhaps you may be less angry at the world for something that cant be controlled.  In summary..... get over it, a large site like this will evolve and change and sometimes it will leave people like you (insult throwing, defensive, insecure people who are scared of change) behind if you don't want to come along for the ride and your only defense is to attempt to alienate a majority through aggressive posting, attempt at ridicule and insult throwing. Unfortunately you are a whisper in a crowd mate and its time you sang along or get the fuck out.  Good day.
I got it the first time. You all are idiots. But I must agree, subtly brilliant as hell.
No.
out of curiousity, what case are you using dude? how was the airflow and such. i've read nothing but good reviews for the gigabyte 560ti.
Up Vote for Sheep in the Big City. I didn't think anyone remembered that! 
Pretty much anywhere in the USA except for a few tolerant states.   Or, you know, if you're black or poor.
Funny how some stars have done something retarded to the point where asking, "Why?" has no answer.  Kind of like when Eddie Jones joined the Heat (It was either his Heat or Lakers days, I can't remember exactly) and dunked in his own basket after a tipoff.  There was also [this](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-NooTivVMpg).
[1994 Sasha &amp; John Digweed - Renaissance: The Mix Collection](http://www.discogs.com/Sasha-John-Digweed-Renaissance-The-Mix-Collection/release/100874?ev=rr) a friend lent me this compilation by sasha and digweed.
Why would anyone want that in their vehicle?
When this goes viral there will be a huge outcry to see this magnificent man's face.  
It doesn't help that I have the pink Taric, but if anyone makes fun of me i just wait until we win and flash them my Taric calling card. 8====D(_o_)'.')
I know what happened, and it was not a meteor. You were wearing blue that day.   Crying after... check... rushed to hospital bleeding from orifices... Check...
I don't really have exact goals, but my average over the last 4 days is:  * 12.9% fat (40g) * 42.8% carbs (132g) * 43.8% protein (135g)
It's a meme merger!
But you just spelled it correctly.
This is jew porn.
Give me a fucking break, it was a joke. It was a bad joke, but it was a mother FUCKING joke.
Did they factor in the eleven days that didn't exist in October 1582?  
but.... what comes next... quadrice?
And here I thought you were just whinging because someone tagged the inside of your book.
It was raining creepers.  And I had no weapon.  I've never rage-swung my stone pick faster in my life... :(
Alright I will keep an eye out.
You are awesome. thats all i have to say. thanks for everything you do!
No worries, I don't care much for karma really. The fact that you were nice enough to write such a thing in support I much more appreciate. Thanks IBoris, as long as you guys stick around I have no reason to stop uploading these :)
It's okay. If you folks want an invite, hit me up. 
Aliens derp too!
Nice try, TSA.
No dude. You said the battery does work.
dude, you are on fire tonight!
&gt;Maybe, but that's not sexism. That's gender roles. Sexism is using power to prevent people from achieving what they want. If a woman or man, for whatever reason, doesn't want to go further, that's not sexism, but it still gets lumped into the figures on "why women make less." It's hard to normalize for personal choices.  I disagree- gender roles are gender roles because they have actual consequences behind breaking them.  It's not a legal consequence, but social disapproval is pretty powerful, especially when parents and authority figures are applying it to children, which certainly happens frequently when it comes to gender roles.  That is certainly a use of power, and it happens so early we don't even know if it prevents people from doing something they would want to do if that influence did not exist.  The hockey example is more about how people acting "rationally" and without explicit sexism can still reinforce disadvantages.  There's very little a girl can do to get that sort of boost, and that seems wrong doesn't it?  Sexism of the past created the situation, and it just sort of perpetuates itself without anyone trying.  I guess at that point one starts getting into differing definitions of sexism.  I have a broader definition, because I don't see a meaningful difference between conscious discrimination and other, unconscious forms of disadvantage. I do agree with your last block almost entirely though.  Stats are infuriating in this area, and I always am asking about proper controls.  Unfortunately even controlling is hard- trying to deal with something as basic as controlling for hours worked can result in missing some important differences.
Found it with tineye  http://hof.povray.org/chado.html
Spoken like someone's who's forever alone and loving it.
Well you best shut you mouth and wait until Tuesday.
Play sports. Do more things and not be such a parents' boy. They're great, but they really held me back on a lot of things.
...wow.  I can't even imagine a more useless video. Thank you.
My husband's parents lost two babies (two separate births) before he was born, and the pictures of his father holding each of them are beautiful and priceless. I think in a strange way it really validates the brief relationship that they had...it makes it more real to someone who wasn't present.
yuckitty
GENERAL STRIKE!
i honestly can't get enough of her in this skirt.  [few more](http://imgur.com/a/yc8Nr)  *Oops, there is a duplicate in the album. Was Distracted.
Every base needs a queen. You inject larva every 29 seconds.  With every larva spawn make an overlord.
They're just mad because they're all too ugly to make any money from such a profession.
Give it time.
Cows are the worst animals ever
tableofgeeks.com Hosted by redditors :)  We're starting up new episodes after I heal up :( Check us out  Also, Stuff Mom Never Told You is great.
we need to go deeper.
&gt;The 34-year-old, who reportedly played for the Blue Bulls  I actually thought that said "Blue Balls."
this would so totally rule
We bought a bottle of that and maybe 7 different sodas. Sugar high AND drunk. Fun stuff.
&gt; Can you think of any institution that receives public funding for which this is true?  are you serious? how about every church, mosque, and religious organization in the country?  &gt; Until then, it violates the separation of church and state   no, you are WRONG  first of all, private christian schools do NOT restrict admissions to christians. your implication to the contrary shows nothing but your ignorance on the subject.  secondly, even if they did, that does not have anything to do with the separation of church and state. look it up.  you may think it's wrong, but it has nothing to do with that doctrine.
&gt; **beta** Secondly, if you need bleeding edge, then upgrade. If the box in question is in any way in production, don't upgrade unless you can handle a downed box.
Considering Terran is already struggling against Protoss and on pretty equal footing with Zerg and their play is Marine-centric in both matchups a Marine nerf would be disastrous unless a bunch of other units were buffed to compensate. Marines are really good but every other Terran unit in existence has glaring flaws which make them necessary.
&gt;There are some serious problems with society at the moment, and a good part of the remedy is going to be revamping and updating democracy.  Yes, true, and my problem with black-bloc tactics is *precisely* that they are *not* democratic.  Their only claim to having a mandate from the masses is that they're the most violent, extremist anonymous thugs mobbing around at any particular protest.  Nobody elected them.  Nobody appointed them.  What possible claim can they have on the authority of the democratic sovereign, the people?
That's amazing! have you posted its source code somewhere?
[Worthless](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=FqT2uOa1-d0) (the video, for those that got it stuck in their head)
I'm pretty sure religions have been based on much less than this.  Let's nail this kid to a cross and call it a day.
nice, that is it
wut?
Money.  Most countries have a 'Business migration' scheme which exists outside of normal citizenship acquisition.  For example in Australia (which is quite xenophobic) it used to be that if you had $250,000 or more in cash you could get a residency visa with ease (assuming you wore no cut off ears on a necklace around your neck).
So much win.
Yes I do this! But it has no effect on him.
muse fan?
no
nah its not a waste, it may mess u up though. I realized how much TV I watched as a kid and how it skewed my prospective on reality. So be careful. 
I'm wondering what you liking the police had to do with that joke...
Buncha bullshit.
I would've guessed it was Gene Wilder.
Letme build it from SVN... what? Still 2.56?? HMMMM!   I better grad the "release". WTF... The version number didn't even change :o   Shouln't there be a new splash screen?
they do at my school- the coke ones at least. unfortunately the food ones don't take CC
Hey can you repost this? It was stuck in the spam filter and no one saw it :|
I enjoy reading Zerohedge and do so regularly, but try not to delve into the comment section too often.  
I can see what you mean - some of the stuff (like say the machine-gun type rolls) can be a little jumbled sounding at times. Dropping the volume on some of the less important elements and maybe panning them to hard Left-Right would free up a bit of room?  For the first half maybe really smacking the 3 with a snare/clap/whatever type sound (which is already there in most of the bars, just not always emphasized much) in the first half beat-y parts while dropping the volume on the other hits would help as well? Then switching to the 2/4 when the 4-on-the-floor type kick comes in later.  I also agree with the end being a bit anticlimactic - I might even just cut the last minute or so into a few bars fading out? When the kick hits around 2:45 and the 8-16 bars following feels like the climax of the song to me.  Anyway just my thoughts, hope this helps!
FUD.
Agreed!  A+
Was Bill Murray there too?
My friend was sleeping over, and decided she wanted to wake me up. She did so by dropping one of the family cats on my face. My earlobe has a subtle-but-decent scar on it now as a result. 
Sure, but it' not practical since most of the games aren't compatible with it, not to mention you'd be paying an arm and a leg for the combo which isn't even official.
that scar is fucking awesome do not be ashamed of it
That's not my point.
I've been doing a lot of lifting but I started adding in more cardio and I'm taking a bodybuilding supplement called Oxyelite-Pro, a super thermogenic that increases your metabolic rate and also acts as an appetite suppressant. It's worked wonder for me so far.   I've been seriously lifting for about a month and a half and just started subbing in cardio about a week and a half ago. For the most part I've lost all that weight within the past week and a half.
It's a leopard seal and it will probably eat that penguin or its children someday.
Another thing to remember is that when marines are in a tight group the total surface area that melee units can attack onto is reduced. Being in a tight ball however makes you susceptible to banelings. The standard response to this is to spread your marines, however that increases your total surface area making zerglings more effective again.  This, among many other factors means you cannot do a 1 to 1 cost benefit analysis to determine which compositions are cost effective. There are too many non-linear relationships to consider.
Ah, I should've thought of that one! I played Peggle a ton when it first came out.
O
the tech center, the most uncomfortable i have ever been while browsing reddit.
This is all I've come up with as well... At work for another hour. NEED IDEAS!
Mine died in a fire.
**MADE UP STORY IS MADE UP**  EDIT: http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/gfwkx/cute_girl_sitting_next_to_me_taking_requests_as/c1n9jjh
Tee Hee he didn't mention his portable hard drive he secretly has hidden.
Lol, don't people realize the cost ineffectiveness of lacing weed with anything at all? How could any newspaper reader in Delaware be like, That makes sense.....
is that 'ramrod' in the presentation panel by any chance?  also epic 9.00am face, thats how i roll as well in the morning
yeeaaahh.... like the setting was interesting but god the MC is just such a douche, I couldn't take it any more &gt;.&lt;  Have fun once spring sets in...
im in east van currently. would love to commute on a bike again.
""enhance" physical characteristics the people shouldn't ever feel they need."  Should people ever feel that they need perfect teeth?  I operate fine without it.  Do well in interviews, make friends in college, have a hot girlfriend.  I don't see any difference besides the degree of change.  It's true that some people are going to be negatively effected, but what do you suggest?  That cosmetic surgery is wrong because some people might have an unhealthy attraction to it?
nope, not personally.
LOL, Dont you mean scumbag notch?
So, um, if you watch a Picasso painting in reverse it's a man destroying a work of art because he's not satisfied with it?
Yes. They are a small step above ISP webmail.
Monsanto has more money than GOD.| FTFY
I love this book so much that I'm getting the [Postertext](http://postertext.com/products/heart-of-darkness) version of it framed right now. Nothing like a book where every sentence is dense with meaning and mood.
Zombies don't digest the food they eat...
Oh, well then perhaps you can do more to explain it; like showing a link. That seems backwards to me. I don't think it's correct.
this leads me to my next question... what the crap is an ASBO?
Quit being a d-bag, just be a d-pad.  I like it.
**esprit d'escalier** | literally 'the spirit of the staircase.' It means coming up with the perfect intelligent, witty thing to say on your way out of the party. **farpotshket** | The art of trying to fix something only to make it far worse. It's like a Frankenstein of obscenity, created from different parts of a dozen swears. The next time you reach to brush a piece of lint off your date's shirt, then spill the bottle of wine on their pants, try screaming, `Farpotshket!  [source](http://www.npr.org/templates/story/story.php?storyId=4818160)
LOL, indeed.
There is some research (based on testing fighter pilots in centrifuges) that when your brain is starving of oxygen it panics and releases a flood of endorphins. Also your visual cortex starts firing randomly. So when you die you see a bright light and have a feeling of warmth and comfort wash over you.   http://www.abc.net.au/science/articles/2007/03/08/1866095.htm  Of course if your brain gets smooshed in some horrible accident you are out of luck i guess.
Looks more like Yog-Sothoth than Cthulhu to me...
The 'padding' looks like just pillows. In the bottom 3 pictures, they are under the table. I don't think they're attached.
Large scar on my right hand (between thumb and index finger) from working at Dunkin Donuts. Cigarette burn on my left in the same location from a stupid drunk night. O.O  My knee is probably going to scar nice... I slipped on some slush pushing people out about a week and a half ago and banged it on a stone that was sticking out of the pavement. Left a trail of blood in the snow! Woo!
That would explain it, but I don't think that they'd have time to enact such a plan.  The first that the Protheans heard of the Reapers was when they came pouring through the Citadel Relay, and then all that they could do was send out a warning.  Vigil didn't even know what the Reapers wanted.  
I genuinely became happy the moment I realized Slavoj was included in this. Thank you sir/madam. 
Yep, I've seen PJ 21 times live and I've seen the famous 3rd encore for myself.  I've also seen a PJ show last just over 3 hours.  They play to their fans and if they need an encore to help them out, then I say good for them.  Most people just think "Oh, they'll play the hits during the encore, what a shitty thing" but I think it's because the band needs a break from playing for a few minutes.  Let the author of the article play for 2 1/2 hours pretty much non stop and see how he feels.
Mmm, Wave flavored.
Haters gonna hate. You made me laugh by calling me a hater and meaning it. 
No so. Due to atmospheric slowing, a small meteor would be traveling at most a few hundred km/h. Meteors of this sort found "fresh" are not hot, but quite the contrary, covered in frost!  If it was of a certain size and had hit his hand, it would be sililar to getting shot, but it almost certainly wouldn't "bounce off"  Likely it was quite small and significantly slowed down if indeed it was a meteor that hit him.
NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!
You are right, they don't seem to care.  They should definitely advertise tournaments but they don't at all.
I wish we could use MoCreatures...that mod makes me squee. 
i thought he gave both of them pills, i was severely disappointed
... Vakeman? I hope you're not going for the Ghostbuster's guys name...
I like yours waaay better
GARR!
I've never used an IDE for python. Is it a big help? Is Wing particularly better than the competition?
think^big think^big think....BIIIIGGGGGGG
Others have given good advice here, but I wanted to add that if you like your GYN doc, I'd mention to them the nurse's behavior so they can put a stop to it.  My OBGYNs were decent enough for my first pregnancy. All 4 docs in the practice were very vocal about calling them if I had any kind of question. So, I did. And both times got the nurse who brushed me off the first time and was outright rude to me the second. So during my next visit, I told the doc I saw about the nurse and how counter-productive it was to advise me to call only to have a harridan at the other end of the line.  The next time I called, the nurse was much nicer and more helpful.
There is no shame if you do it ironically.
I'm 100-percent sure that it was my uncle's.  He saw me wearing it and just about died laughing.  It was a cool belt and I wish that I still had it.  Embossed brown leather with a heavy metal buckle.
haha. yeah. the motherboard thing is the plague of the m1330. the on that burnt up was a m1330 and we got it replaced with an m1340, which seems to be pretty nice so far. hopefully i don't have to deal with warranty support. 
Drinking one of the many Highway 78's right now. I will be sad when my stash of them is gone. ):
thanks for the info, I really appreciate it.  I'll still probably get a greyhound, hopefully the burgler might just get scared for the sake that there's a dog, a beware of dog sign, an ADT sign, and of course a real ADT alarm.  ;)
mmmmm red velvet kitty :] my favorite
i still dont see a point to having a tablet. its just a accessory, not a stand alone machine. what can it do that my pc cannot?
I'll use blue ink. You use black.
Wake County Sheriff Donnie Harrison disagrees. "No question it's a safety issue. I want to know who's buying those pistols," said Harrison, a Republican.  Uhhhm, no. Go fuck yourself.  
If you have a job at all, then $25 isn't much. Especially if you love Halo.
it's legal to vote in Canadia?
Hey, but...   Then why do I...  *looks at subreddit*   Oh, fuck off.
I would have never guess from your shoes alone that you are 18....  I like them alot actually. 
I think your own statement just proved yourself wrong.  You're a discredit to your position if all you can do to attack a logical argument is to hurl insults *ad hominem*. 
Ah, thank you for correcting me sir.  I do believe I should have dug up my Mechwarrior manuals before posting.
he's big into transcendental meditation. Really believes in the [Maharishi Effect](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/John_Hagelin#Research_on_the_Maharishi_Effect) which I'd assume most rational people don't. BTW, after taking DMT he dropped out of Occupational Therapy school, moved to Colorado and now chops wood for a living.
Thanks guys! I finally got it!  I went back to the place I got my supplies from and the woman showed me a few techniques in 15 minutes, no charge. I'm currently on row 3 of my scarf ^_^  Used a long tail cast with a continental knit stitch and even managed to weave the tail into the few beginning stitches
There is nothing about the term 'martial arts' which requires them to be Asian in origin.  Classical fencing and swordsmanship from Europe are also martial arts.  Long before fencing was a sport there were many schools teaching codified arts for killing people on the battlefield and off.  Africa has many types of wrestling, they also have stick fighting and I'm sure there are systems for the other weapons they used.  There are thousands and thousands of non-Asian influenced martial arts.  Also, what is this complete and perfect martial art that you practice?
I quickly tell them that I can't help.
clearly OP is just jelly. 
Upvoted, for great Justice. =)
Thank you. 
this is some excellent fencing.
only if its telecommute, I'd never venture into that filthy city on a daily basis..
I've got my tickets. I'm traveling from Columbus to be there. 
Not to downplay the whole "rape" thing, but if it doesn't involve brutal physical violence, then it's just unwanted sex.  If the person who was raped doesn't think it's a big deal, then maybe it's not a coping mechanism as much as it's just not a big deal in their psyche.  For instance, some people are emotionally shattered when a spouse cheats on them.  Other people live happily in open relationships where sex with other people is expected.  Is that a coping mechanism, or is it just that some people are wired to feel victimized by certain events?  Again, I think it's a horrible act because of the emotional and often physical damage, but if someone doesn't want to feel like a victim, why should we tell them they are?
What the fuck am I watching?
I wonder what Ernie Hudson has to say on the matter.   [I see](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:10.17.09ErnieHudsonByLuigiNovi.jpg)
battlefield doesn't have the AI that Half Life did... (yes I know picture isn't of Half Life) plus those two games aren't even made in the same year... anyway.. everyone knows that computers are capable of much better graphics than any console and are constantly improving. You can't upgrade the graphics on an xbox 360. Edit: PCs invented the FPS... remember such games as DOOM, Wolfenstien, and Duke Nukem.  on the PC first.
the ambulances will have to wait their turn
Someone please make a joke about "Highest hotel"
[](/megustaperfect"Who doesn't?")
It's funny that you made this but are incapable of centering your font.
I think I need to start using "Can I take your picture, post it on the internet, and tell the world you're a hottie?" as my standard pickup line.
Not necessarily a skill, but I don’t take advantage of my good health and I don’t take care of my body the way I should. People who are wheelchair bound dream of running (I’m assuming) but I just sit there in front of the TV/iPad all evening.
&gt; Bloomberg News reporters received two CD-ROMs, each containing an identical set of 894 PDF files, from Fed attorney Yvonne Mizusawa at about 9:45 a.m. in the lobby of the Martin Building in Washington.   The release was pursuant to a FOIA request from Bloomberg, so Bloomberg has the documents.  Hopefully they'll release the source, along with their analysis, but it'd be a lot more interesting to me if the Fed had disclosed the collateral they accepted. Ninja Edit: [asharp45 seems to have found a link](http://www.reddit.com/r/Economics/comments/gfl6y/dick_move_fed_releases_discount_window_data_in/c1n9jtw).  
what does it do?
IE = HAHAHAHAHAHAHA!  But seriously, I was just looking at the pricing when I switched to my reddit tab to see this.  How often does stuff like this happen? How many HD games are usually shown? 
I didn't really vote last year so this year if you want, I can vote for you!
I do mean 'being' as in the state of existence.  I've been coming to terms with the relative nature of things for quite some time, but 'being' seems to be the only thing that I can't entirely set up in relational terms.  From my point of view, there can be no definition of or criterion for being other than as possessing some physical presence.  There seems to me to be no situation where in one frame of reference something exists and another it does not.  Being, I feel, is the starting point from which all other properties spawn and are in relation to - something exists absolutely, and that which exists has relational properties.  
Interesting. I have some problems with that article, but thank you for posting it!  I upvoted, even though I disagree.   I think there are a lot of interesting arguments to be made about the possible sexism in cooking fields, and statistics about how many top chefs are men, and the tacit process by which authority is assumed in the kitchen, but this article is not one of them.   I take Tiffany Derry's viewpoint seriously, and thought she made an interesting point about heart versus science. I admit I am impressed by the molecular gastronomy stuff, though I would be no matter what gender used it.  It's odd coming from her, as she was the voted fan favorite of her season and won a ton of challenges.   I don't agree about the soup issue, but I suppose I believe in the show enough to think it was really about the technical skill in Mike's dish, not a gendered thing. They are not fans of overly strong and not "clean" flavor profiles, from what I've seen. They've said it about dishes from men, too.  The judges and guest judges are pretty equal male and female, too, so if they are using some gendered bias to manufacture male finalists there are female judges in on it, all the time, then.   The first Tiffani's perspective (Faison's) about how men are allowed to be more emotional is not that accurate, imo. I think some of the contestants who have been held up to the most ridicule and hatred have been men - Marcel, in particular. What people hated about Tiffani (Faison) they *really* hated about Marcel, and have hated Dale for the same reason. Angelo was often thought to be sabotaging people, as well. Mike took shit for plagiarizing Richard, and it was that incident that made me a Richard fan, for sure.   I do think gender could play a role in quite a few of these shows, but I guess I just don't see the evidence of it here, as a removed viewer. Jen Caroll was rude, but they disliked her dish before she was rude. By that same token, a lot of people think Marcel lost his season because of his terrible personality, too. Further, some of the most likable qualities of the contestants are not traditionally gendered ones - Richard is famous for doubting himself incessantly, Angelo for sabotaging himself, and all chefs who manifest qualities like arrogance, lack of consideration, inability to work in groups, are viewed negatively.   I wonder if anything will come of the Tiffanies' perspectives. I'd be curious to hear what the judges make of them.   I don't think I understand what remedy the article is suggesting - should the contestants be judged more on "heart"? Wouldn't that be patronizing to everyone involved? That women getting upset be subject to the same treatment that Marcel got? (be held down and someone trying to shave his head because his personality was not liked. Seriously, if that happened to a woman, the people responsible would have been arrested, as I think his attackers should have been.)  I'm a fan of the show and interested in gender issues. I'm not sure what to make of this article - the contestants themselves don't appear to blame the judges, beyond Faison, so it just seems like sour grapes instead of a [comment on potential overall real inequities in the industry.](http://www.starchefs.com/features/editors_dish/salary_survey/2009/index.shtml) [Summarized here.](http://www.slashfood.com/2010/07/02/female-chefs-make-24-percent-less-than-male-chefs/) (Note: all due caveats about these kind of surveys, of course.)  ***And before anyone points it out, yes, I am a tasteless git who likes reality shows and can admit it. :p I don't think they're particularly artistic or valuable, culturally, but they're often entertaining. I sometimes eat processed and convenient food, too. 
Needs something to listen to in his used minivan with the kids
Perfect.  You must be an angry man.
My mom loves to tell this story...When I was a little kid (early 90s) all the kids on our block really wanted the April Oneil ninja turtles action figure. Apparently every one of us ended up rubbing her chest on the sidewalk until the paint from her top came off leaving some kind of deformed scratchy chested ground beef boobs  TL,DR : just another reason everyone growing up today should be grateful for Internet porn
[](/yey "It's my [first comic] and also a [true story]")
pretty cool cat lady. consider uploading on this forum too:   http//:www.feed-forward.net  Full disclosure- I'm an admin of the site.  You'll get lots of feedback there...  -Shoham
fuck you moron cockhead. 
MOAR GRAFIX!1
I drive both automatic and manual. My family has one of each.  I am inclined to use the auto more frequently when driving to work and back, because in the heavy traffic I don't need to become a nervous wreck every ten seconds. I just plug in the audiobook and relax.  I also prefer extremely long voyages in the automatic. I get to pay more attention to the vistas around me than I would with the manual, where I'd have to focus more on the road. And again, long hour drives on auto let you get where you want much more relaxed.  Also exploring. Auto kicks ass when exploring new roads. And parking.  One thing I just have to accept though is that the manual drive car is much more fun on low traffic, and an absolute thrill when speeding. Everything suddenly becomes a race.
see Frankie I told ya  "when they get me check it out,  get the paper, or on Dooley's wall  look out for old T's picture  if i'm frownin then  i'm gonna turn you in  so get the boys and move as fast you can  if i'm smilin they got nothin  chill and wait i'll see you soon  but if my eyes are closed  Frankie if my eyes are closed  you don't gotta worry  you don't gotta worry cos i'm done  they're gonna strap me in and turn me on  and the those things i know  'll steam up through my skull into the room  nd you guys won't have to worry"
This is just more politically correct bullshit. So comedians can TALK about things way more outrageous than this, and movies can SHOW way more outrageous things than this, but video games can't.   Here's an idea. Don't like it, Don't buy it! And parents -- how about monitoring what your kids are playing. It's your job to make sure they're not watching porn and playing with guns (atleast until they're old enough). Stop playing content police.
Can't make it, but keep in touch! Hope it's a good time.
Reminds me of Nagrand.
Things are changing and evolving. Maybe we are actually changing things by knowing other people that share our opinions by way of upvote. 
Thank you I'll give it a shot. What is absolutely needed to test if a mobo works? Like what will it turn on without?
Overt Acts  A. On December 9, 2001, CHENEY announced on NBC's Meet the Press that "it was pretty well confirmed" that lead 9/11 hijacker Mohamed Atta had met the head of Iraqi intelligence in Prague in April 2001, which statement was, as CHENEY well knew, made without reasonable basis and with reckless disregard for the truth, because it was based on a single witness's uncorroborated allegation that had not been fully investigated by U.S. intelligence agencies.  B. On July 15, 2002, POWELL stated on Ted Koppel's Nightline: "What we have consistently said is that the President has no plan on his desk to invade Iraq at the moment, nor has one been presented to him, nor have his advisors come together to put a plan to him," which statement was deliberately false and misleading in that it deceitfully implied the President was not planning an invasion of Iraq when, as POWELL well knew, the President was close to finalizing detailed military plans for such an invasion that he had ordered months previously.  C. On August 26, 2002, CHENEY made numerous false and fraudulent statements including: "Simply stated there is no doubt that Saddam Hussein now has weapons of mass destruction. There is no doubt that he is amassing them to use against our friends, against our allies, and against us," when, as CHENEY well knew, this statement was made without reasonable basis and with reckless indifference to the truth in that the IC's then prevailing assessment was that Iraq had neither nuclear weapons nor a reconstituted nuclear weapons program.  D. On September 7, 2002, appearing publicly with Blair, BUSH claimed a recent IAEA report stated that Iraq was "six months away from developing a [nuclear] weapon" and "I don't know what more evidence we need," which statements were made without basis and with reckless indifference to the truth in that: (1) the IAEA had not even been present in Iraq since 1998; and (2) the report the IAEA did write in 1998 had concluded there was no indication that Iraq had the physical capacity to produce weapons-usable nuclear material or that it had attempted to obtain such material.  E. On September 8, 2002, on Late Edition with Wolf Blitzer, RICE asserted that Saddam Hussein was acquiring aluminum tubes that were "only suited" for nuclear centrifuge use, which statement was deliberately false and fraudulent, and made with reckless indifference to the truth in that it omitted to state the following material facts: (1) the U.S. intelligence community was deeply divided about the likely use of the tubes; (2) there were at least fifteen intelligence reports written since April 2001 that cast doubt on the tubes' possible nuclear-related use; and (3) the U.S. Department of Energy nuclear weapons experts had concluded, after analyzing the tubes's specifications and the circumstances of the Iraqis' attempts to procure them, that the aluminum tubes were not well suited for nuclear centrifuge use and were more likely intended for artillery rocket production.  F. On September 8, 2002, RUMSFELD stated on Face the Nation: "Imagine a September 11th, with weapons of mass destruction. It's not three thousand, it's tens of thousands of innocent men, women and children," which statement was deliberately fraudulent and misleading in that it implied without reasonable basis and in direct contradiction to then prevailing intelligence that Saddam Hussein had no operational relationship with al Qaeda and was unlikely to provide weapons to terrorists.  G. On September 19, 2002, RUMSFELD told the Senate Armed Services Committee that "no terrorist state poses a greater or more immediate threat to the security of our people than the regime of Saddam Hussein," which statement was, as Rumsfeld well knew, made without reasonable basis and with reckless indifference to the truth in that: (1) Hussein had not acted aggressively toward the United States since his alleged attempt to assassinate President George H. W. Bush in 1993; (2) Iraq's military forces and equipment were severely debilitated because of UN sanctions imposed after the 1991 Gulf War; (3) the IC's opinion was that Iraq's sponsorship of terrorists was limited to ones whose hostility was directed toward Israel; and (4) Iran, not Iraq, was the most active state sponsor of terrorism.  H. On October 1, 2002, the defendants caused the IC's updated classified National Intelligence Estimate to be delivered to Congress just hours before the beginning of debate on the Authorization to Use Military Force. At the same time, the defendants caused an unclassified "White Paper" to be published which was false and misleading in many respects in that it failed to include qualifying language and dissents that substantially weakened their argument that Iraq posed a serious threat to the United States.  I. On October 7, 2002, in Cincinnati, Ohio, BUSH made numerous deliberately misleading statements to the nation, including stating that in comparison to Iran and North Korea, Iraq posed a uniquely serious threat, which statement BUSH well knew was false and fraudulent in that it omitted to state the material fact that a State Department representative had been informed just three days previously that North Korea had actually already produced nuclear weapons. The defendants continued to conceal this information until after Congress passed the Authorization to Use Military Force against Iraq.  J. Between September 1, 2002, and November 2, 2002, BUSH traveled the country making in excess of thirty congressional-campaign speeches in which he falsely and fraudulently asserted that Iraq was a "serious threat" which required immediate action, when as he well knew, this assertion was made without reasonable basis and with reckless indifference to the truth.  K. In his January 28, 2003 State of the Union address, BUSH announced that the "British have recently learned that Iraq was seeking significant quantities of uranium from Africa" which statement was fraudulent and misleading and made with reckless disregard for the truth, in that it falsely implied that the information was true, when the CIA had advised the administration more than once that the allegation was unsupported by available intelligence.  L. In a February 5, 2003, speech to the UN, POWELL falsely implied, without reasonable basis and with reckless disregard for the truth, that, among other things: (1) those who maintained that Iraq was purchasing aluminum tubes for rockets were allied with Saddam Hussein, even though POWELL well knew that both Department of Energy nuclear weapons experts and State Department intelligence analysts had concluded that the tubes were not suited for nuclear centrifuge use; and (2) Iraq had an ongoing cooperative relationship with al Qaeda, when he well knew that no intelligence agency had reached that conclusion.  M. On March 18, 2003, BUSH sent a letter to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the Senate which asserted that further reliance on diplomatic and peaceful means alone would not either: (1) adequately protect United States national security against the "continuing threat posed by Iraq" or (2) likely lead to enforcement of all relevant UN Security Council resolutions regarding Iraq, which statement was made without reasonable basis and with reckless indifference to the truth in that, as BUSH well knew, the U.S. intelligence community had never reported that Iraq posed an urgent threat to the United States and there was no evidence whatsoever to prove that Iraq had either the means or intent to attack the U.S. directly or indirectly. The statement was also false because, as BUSH well knew, the UN weapons inspectors had not found any weapons of mass destruction in Iraq and wanted to continue the inspection process because it was working well.  N. In the same March 18, 2003 letter, BUSH also represented that taking action pursuant to the Resolution was "consistent with continuing to take the necessary actions against international terrorists and terrorist organizations, including those nations, organizations or persons who planned, authorized, committed, or aided the terrorists attacks that occurred on September 11, 2001," which statement was entirely false and without reasonable basis in that, as BUSH well knew, Iraq had no involvement with al Qaeda or the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001.  All in violation of Title 18, United States Code, Section 371.
Self actualization. 
Anyone see this and think 'superpowers'?
Can people please not write 'April Fools from Reddit!' on the vid? Kinda spoils the whole thing :/
That's what I was expecting.
Can I ask where you live?
i know what happened: you took your cap off a water bottle and pressed it against your palm
The Japanese call them Pineapples as well
WTF?  How oblivious could she get?
HOW DID I GET HERE?
I too don't see the problem, that's a grape choice of an icon.
Wow, you tried to trick us into subscribing to your feed. Way to fail hard, spammer.
Bitches love the smell of my aroma.
I cried at the end.  On a date.  My girlfriend called me gay, and I didn't care.
I can't wait.  My entire life I've always just felt restrained by the limits of physical existence.  Death would be an end to the constant frustration that is life.  Or, if our consciousness does somehow persist, it will be freedom from the constraints of mortality.
Money goes in, wallet disappears, you can't explain that!
Quite a bit actually. I know bits of several other languages too. What about you?
A *beautiful* tradition.
It has been raining for 30+ days here, so yeah it sucks. But after living here for a while you get used to it. I rather have rain than snow.
This site was blocked by OpenDNS in response to either the Conficker virus, the Microsoft IE zero-day vulnerability, or some equally serious vulnerability.  Umm, ok guess I'll pass....
The difference between influence and manipulation is determined by the individual using these methods.
Someone should slap those bitches to knock some sense into them. The flag doesnt cap itself.!
Sewer levels actually.
&gt; would you have been in more trouble if you slapped your sister, or slapped your mother?  I think it'd be worse to slap one's sibling (I never had any sisters, but I have two brothers), at least when they're also still kids, because they're physically weaker than an adult, and they (usually) have less experience with taking a physical attack. It's never good to hit either - and it's never good to hit anyone - but looking at this as a hypothetical parent, my kid hits me, no huge deal (but he/she still should be disciplined and made aware that violence won't be tolerated). One of the kids hits another kid, my altruistic side is much more offended by that, and my response to the child who hit the other one will be correspondingly different.  Can this metaphor be extended to humans and God? (My answer: probably not, since the two greatest commandments: to love God and to love our neighbors are spoken in the same sentence and seem to be quite equal. )
That's perfectly fine! Glad to have more people
Refolding that plastic is not as easy as unfolding it, and takes up so much more space.  Did you find that it would be implausible to fit all of that, and a body, in a few duffel bags?  Something I've always wondered...
Winter is coming...
I still have every single one of them made. Too bad I'm not at my house, otherwise I'd post a picture.
agree.
I'm 6'3 and 135 pounds. Looks like I'm forever alone...
This was very good. Make more stuff like this!
Nobody is saying that -- there is nowhere in any of my posts saying that. However, you can't act like collecting guns is morally equivalent to collecting baseball cards, which you did.
nice... 
In regards to the takeaway, if she doesn't take the bait, should I just move on to a different target? 
Tell them not to show their face in the picture.
Early anthropology was so very very strange and flawed, but as you say, quite notable.
Zionism über alles?   Knesset, I am disappoint.
&gt; 25% of the population has admitted to raping someone  Are those guys completely crazy? What's wrong with them?
Moral of the story: don't trust the lampies.
Yep. Say it with me:  "Helpdesk, this is &lt;name&gt; speaking, how can I help you?"
Came here to say this. It's the best eBook trackers I've seen. Sadly, I don't have any invites to offer.
I watched her do that for a little while.
http://londonmoms.ca/ is without a doubt the largest London based forum on the internet with 1.3 million posts.  From what my wife tells me men are allowed but there are very few.
Those all say the same thing.  You can use Android, but if you want Google's branding and access to the Google Market, you have to comply with their rules.  As an Android app developer, I consider this a good thing.  If I were a carrier, yeah, I'd probably be pissed.  Basically, they're saying "don't fuck with our shit too much if you want our approval."  The side effect of this is that carriers that want the Google branding will have an easier time upgrading when new Android versions come out.  So, in the end, this is a win for the consumer.  The carriers don't like this because they want the Google branding and they want to heavily modify their version of Android to differentiate them in the market.  This can also be seen as good for consumers (SenseUI vs. Motoblur competition for example), but it makes it really hard for app developers sometimes.  This is kind of a "damned if you do.  damned if you don't" kind of thing.
I hadn't even considered that, but I think there may be something to your hypothesis here.
Someone get Alex Jones on the case!  To the Jones mobile!
Damn, I collect these! Jealous! 
You're the man now dog.
This picture is so false. Computer graphics are better, computers are more powerful. It's just the fact that most people play on regular monitors, if you hook up a computer to the screen you use the console on it's better.
Upvote for the phrase "vaginal childbirth". It amuses me for some reason.
i don't.
Is this guy a redditor?  http://www.reddit.com/user/Boojamon  If so, doesn't this defeat the purpose?
clean your hands
april fools...
The book bag I got in 2000 when I was still in high school is still in great condition even now.
Explosions in the Sky.  Throw everyone off.
Dude, you ever had friends move away? It's kinda hard work to keep tabs on everyone, to the point that it's not worth it. 
Can you elaborate on this? What exactly are they doing that NASA isn't (wiki was vague).
Heat. Awakenings. Cape Fear. Jackie Brown, especially the parking lot scene.  Nothing after the year 1999, when he started acting in whatever paid.
Ignatieff would smoke his ass. Harper's a godamn puss pop. 
If you read the comments you'll realize that ***hardly anyone*** really believes him.   All the top responses are either jokes or requesting proof.
Nice.   I noticed this little gem in the side bar. [mercedes vs smartcar](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=L4k0FWvGoSM&amp;feature=related)
Doh!
wow. i'm really trying to find another way to say it, but... wow? haha. idk why you don't post more ass shots. :P i'm not typically an ass man, but now i'm a believer. haha. edit: also, just read your post about being only 5"3. my response: no way? your legs look so good that you can't even tell.
Snooki at Wrestlemania is one of those bad jokes that happens in real life. No matter how stupid you imagine people can be, they can get even more stupid.
A relative of I.R. Baboon perhaps?
Oh, that's just plain silly. I only eat aborted babies, why would I possibly wash my hair with one?
Iron Tank, Conflict, Contra, Mario 3, Zelda, Sky Kid.
I stopped using plastic lighters at the beginning of the 21st century.  But I'm a weird guy.  You should use matches or a Zippo. http://discovermagazine.com/2008/jul/10-the-worlds-largest-dump/article_view?b_start:int=0&amp;-C=
Rock-it had an awesome life thanks to you and your wife.  Lucky dog chose you two.  My condolences.
ROFL AT THE REFLECTION IN THE MIRROR! 
Jokes on us?? Rape the cat raper!!
Rent 744t and some microphones it's not that expensive and sound a lot better than the zoom, but if you're on a tight budget the zoom vill do just fine 
This was my point this whole time, you don't need to sacrifice performance in 9mm to be subsonic.  Research 9mm rounds, and you will find that the 147 gr subsonic rounds perform as well or better than the 124gr +P rounds, or any other 9mm loading.  There is a lot more to 9mm performance than muzzle energy, and I choose to carry subsonic 147 gr 9mm rounds in my carry weapon even suppressed over the supersonic 9mm choices, because they penetrate better and perform better through barriers.  And secondary to that point was that .45 ACP always has more muzzle energy, whether suppressed or not, and you just admitted that the 9mm suppressed noise level is similar to the .45, so I simply do not see any reason why you would claim the two rounds are about equal unsuppressed, but the .45 takes the lead when suppressed.  It makes no sense.  Either the .45 is better all the time, or they are equal all the time, from the arguments you have made.  You have made no arguments that show why the .45 would somehow gain more from being suppressed than the 9mm.
STFU.
I don't know about hiking in the UK but the same reasoning seems to apply in the US since through hikers on our major trails have largely switched to trail running shoes. I think the idea is that you'll get your feet wet anyway crossing streams so you might as well get a shoe that drains instead of a waterproof one that stays wet. Granted, it's nice when the water doesn't quite go over the top of your boot.
Guy here, would definitely prefer overweight women for enhanced t&amp;a
Seriously, it's just a dog being a dog. My buddies golden does this every time he comes home from work at the end of the day.
Nothing wrong with it, just making the point that they didn't have to create their own.
Your not even masters, you dont understand the game, why bother posting here?
OP, what did you do when you caught the student?
Ya, I will be studying while I am there too.  I will make sure to try and find the SC2 tournament room.  This is my first time so I have no idea what to expect.
I went to Six Flags Magic Mountain in California yesterday, and there were no lines to anything except X2. It was amazing. My friends and I even go to go straight to the car loading on Goliath, which usually has a line that takes 45 minutes
&gt;you simply ignore them.  I do. I'm not putting unnecessary wear on my clutch. 
ur an amazing person.
Just keep telling yourself that you absolutely control your actions. It sounds like you're still reserving that some of your actions are due to an unknown force and you just can't help it. Remember that you can do whatever you want. You choose how you react. Taking full responsibility for your actions will help a lot.
Me too :) 
DAE think it's sexy to fulfill their natural biological impulses? Just saying, sounds pretty normal.  And for the record, no, the thought of this terrifies me to no end.
A man named ibreakkidslegs continues to post "APRIL FOOLS FROM REDDIT." Can someone break his hands?
I love you for this :D
But how could he do that with boxing gloves on?
Nailed it!
FUCKING GROSS
Those islamic atheist terrorists are surely going to be communists, or maybe nazis.
if you're on USeast ladder I have a passive skills GC for you.
DEWD HE DIDN'T MEAN TH-
[This fucker right here](http://www.smashbros.com/en_us/items/assist/images/assist08/assist08_070926a.jpg).
THey aren't ceasing NOW to operate
Its okay. I suffer from the same ailment. Do you ever get it so your poop makes a bridge over the hole and just sits there above the water on the first flush? The, on the second, it breaks in half, organizing itself as a super-poop to clog the drain.  Anyone?
The semi-into part is the problem. Not interested enough to learn or care about alternative cultures, interested enough to profit off the association. Yes that does make you a fuckwit hipster.
As people continue to live longer, does that mean we are always going to have to keep increase our population?
i know who i'm giving mold to...
Didn't read through all the comments, so I apologize if this was already said, but good on you for going out there and petitioning for something you believe in.  With all the facebook activists nowadays, it's especially commendable when people take it to the streets, despite how overwhelming it can all feel.  Hell, I'm even impressed with Tea Baggers getting out there, despite believing that they are sorely mistaken.  Assuming your story is true and not embelished too much, I also give you props on the flip-flopper remark.  Full points.  
[](/wat "Daddies'?")  [](/pft "You and your "partner" are gay.")
I agree on the sound, I thought it was great. I actually like the POV, it didn't bother me at all, it made me get the feeling of actually being enclosed in that mech.
nincompoops
I think my parents had sex one night and 12 months later or so my mom pooped out my sister. They are both remarried now.  
Am I the only one who said "like a boss" after every panel?
My word, REddit has certainly gone down hill.
This has been going on for decades.  Retard, Idiot, Moron, etc. used to be medical/psychological terms. They no longer have the same connotations.  That being said, my mother was a special education teacher. She has her college text books still (from the 70s) with titles including the word "retarded."
The nice part is project-open is fully web based, with gantt charting and compatible with gantt-project.
My dad volunteered to be a page turner at my mom's friendly piano recital.  My dad isn't the manliest dude in the world but I still can't imagine their origins being so damn cute.
This would be perfect for my irrational fear of zombies.
Do it to yourself! :D  Or do your lips four different colours! As long as nobody sees you, it's okay.
I like that it combined Psychological, action, and steampunk elements, and also the way they set up the movie from the beginning was cool to me. However i wish there was more character development in some of the other group members like Blondie. Personally I watched it online and I think i would have regretted paying full price for it at a theatre. Its a rental movie. There are action movies with better storylines, but if anyones interested in a watered down Inception/Alice in Wonderland hybrid with hot girls doing badass fighting, it would be worth looking into
I have a foot long or so scar on my left side because when I was 1 I apparently thought it would be a good idea to pull a hot clothes iron off the board and it fell on top of me.  Still haven't thought up a badass alternative version to tell girls.
They weren't equal cost, since it made really bad assumptions like assuming that you can convert gas to minerals when in fact if you are going mass Marines gas is a huge issue (you can't spend it, your opponent is spending it, so trading minerals for gas is suddenly not as good as you might think). Also, in any real game scenario mass Marines gets demolished so it's all good.
I graduated with a 3.84.  But, I'm an artist.  No value.
Sushi joints serve lots of bombers (22oz bottle). You need less than 30 bombers for a 5 gallon batch. I recommend skipping 12oz bottles and using bombers instead. Any craft beer bar worth their salt will also have bombers.
Yup, on world 60 there's a few clan chats. I use w60pengs. 
Yeah. It requires more reading work to figure out where those magician parenthesis are.
They're never going to finish Deadspace at this rate.
I take him to a fairly huge dog park where he runs around with dozens of other dogs, but still never a peep.
Screw that, the original vandalism was when they put it on there in the first place. 
I'd hate to have to reload it.
oh weirrrrd almost all of your recent comments are in /r/libertarian didnt see that one coming
Im sure we can beat nashville. Vancouver is what worries me the most out of all the other teams in the west
nice! Really reminds me of Carlo Mollino's work
Man, I wish I would've shown him this video: http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CIJ1jcIV7aE  It is PERFECT.
I gotta get off reddit.
How is it possible for the stars to move in the opposite direction to the sun/moon?  Sorry, but that was the first thing I noticed.  Other than that it's pretty good. Nice and smooth using FF4 on my old 1.6Ghz Thinkpad laptop.
Nope, thank god for that.... 
[Well, now you do.](http://www.africahunting.com/content/2-managing-african-elephant-populations-act-let-die-401/)
Will someone please FTFY so the .gif ends with the footage of the F-14 that was shot down last week by Libyan guerrillas?
This is 100% true. That said, I wouldn't be at all upset if all of my friends were 3500 Master League'ers who were helpful and patient, and got me up to their level.  AND THEN I get better than all of them. I would literally never stop talking shit.
On a side note salvia is quite fun / funny.  I had a friend ask if he was dressed right (like he thought we were going to a club or something) then he started shouting at us to stop laughing at him (we weren't laughing, at first anyway, lol).  I personally was told / convinced that squeezing the piece of pizza I was holding would 'save my life' lol.  I just remember coming to my senses squeezing the crap out of a piece of pizza.
No it isn't.  Borlaug's work saved billions.  And in case you failed to notice, I hate Monsanto as well.  But genetically engineered crops happen to be amazing at feeding people.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Norman_Borlaug
You've hit the nail on the head there, explaining PageKite has proven to be rather difficult.  It solves the same problems as you might use dynamic DNS for (making a home server visible), but it uses completely different technology (tunnels and proxies) so it works in many situations where dynamic DNS wouldn't help at all.  So you can run a website on your laptop, and it'll be visible whenever you have Internet connectivity - at home, at school, at work, at an Internet café...  Or you can put a remotely accessible SSH server on a Linux vitrual machine running behind 2 layers of NAT.
" big brown eyes and a funny expression " 
I was learning how to D.J. when my buddy (who was teaching me) put this track on the turntable.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hitRhTAGXDA  It was the fall of 1984. 
Canadians don't use the internet. Bell said so.
&gt; But her face was right outside my window.  This is one of my greatest fears (shudders)  Great story!  But she better stay the fuck away from me.
Actually, I think that Creed Bratton is the real life version of Creed Bratton.
If you can add a single line of javascript, then: http://www.mathjax.org/docs/1.1/start.html#mathjax-cdn
Why?
How hard is it to say "hey I got some books" and hit enter? Geez.
i used to think the same way when i was younger.  i think it's a combination of [okay] and first hand knowledge that you're not doing yourself any favors by arguing with police.  i know it doesn't seem fair, but they **do** have authority over you, and if you refuse to accept that, they will be harder on you.  just be compliant, and if you are that upset about the incident then follow up through the proper channels.  pissing off cops never results in a net gain.
but but but it's not the 1st yet!
Khmer: ma-naugh. 
&gt;are a form of self-censorship  Like hell they are, the MPAA ratings have an enormous impact on a film's marketability.
I don't think you know the will of the people, or whether (or not) they have attempted using the mechanisms of change currently in place. I also do not think you know Black bloc's motivations.  I do think that a large part of Black Bloc's support is a direct result of the view that protesting is cool. And Black Bloc's form of protesting is a way to release personal frustrations in a focused, group-think way.
buy a puppy!
Yuh like an epic hole through his hand!
The face of that guy made me laugh pretty hard.
You know your history ;)
butt crack lol
"Only if the Bible is in error am I wrong..." these guys never get around to admitting the second part. 
From what I learned from Office Space you need a million dollars. Other than that, good fucking luck.
Not every Christian denomination believes that the next life after Earth is permanent. Catholics believe in purgatory, and Mormons believe in the Spirit World, for example.
dont know how the guy driving the automatic can keep a poker face while getting head. lol
Once you got past the point of including people you knew immediately, how did you advertise WMP? I can't imagine you posted fliers around campus..
The moment I clicked the play button, I knew there was something special was about to happen. The emotions washed over me like an ocean of love,﻿ empathy, sadness joy, excitement, anger and arousal. Just when I though there could be no more, the sheer passion and ferocity that was put into this video completely floor any preconceptions or ideals I held for the universe. It was as if the wallet was a mountain filled with the gold ore of tenacity and the crisp banknote drilled out that ore.
They probably got up in the same way Ostriches/Rheas do. Also what does "decided that the bones went together in this order" mean exactly? Are you proposing we start sticking jawbones on hip joints?  An artist depiction is just a skosh more liberal in interpretation than an assemblage of bones.
Symbolism over substance. Liberal, progressive, red diaper doper babies doings things to make themselves feeeeeeel better.
you're making the Romans out to be some kind of Age of Englightenment freethinkers, but nothing could be farther from the truth.  Generally speaking, they were pretty rabidly religious.  They built many temples to many gods, and declared their dead emperors to be gods.  Religion was woven into politics, civil affairs, military operations -- see [Pontifex Maximus](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pontifex_maximus), [Augur](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Augur), [Pantheon](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pantheon,_Rome), [Vestal Virgin](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vestal_Virgin), etc. etc. etc.  Every day of your life, you'd pour a few drops of a tasty beverage (wine, milk) onto your household altar before drinking.  You wouldn't go into battle without sacrificing a *hostia* first.  The rite that the priests (Augurs) performed when swearing into certain offices was called the *inauguratio...*  There were around 40 religious festivals on the Roman calendar.  Some lasted for several days, so that there were actually more sacred days (holy days... holidays) on the calendar than ordinary (profane) ones.  When things went badly for the Roman Empire, people would say that it was because the Romans had turned away from correct religious practice and they were suffering from the anger of the gods (*ira deorum*).  The typical Roman was religious and superstitous.  Lucretius was not.  Oh sure, if the Roman Empire hadn't falled, we might have invented warp drive by now.  Which the Empire would then be using to invade other planets in the name of the Senate and People of Rome.  Meanwhile, you'd be a slave, toiling away in the radioactive di-lithium mines, looking forward to the next episode of *Barbarian Gladiators* on TV when your shift was over.
Second paragraph in chapter 1: &gt; There you are, and you suddenly realize that you are spending your whole life just barely getting by. You keep up a good front. You manage to make ends meed somehow and look OK from the outside. But those periods of desperation, those times when you feel everything caving in on you, you keep those to yourself. You are a mess. And you know it. But you hide it beautifully. Meanwhile, way down under all that you just know there has got be some other way to live, some better way to look at the world, some way to touch life more fully. You click into it by chance now and then. You get a good job. You fall in love. You win the game. and for a while, things are different. Life takes on a richness and clarity that makes all the bad times and humdrum fade away. The whole texture of your experience changes and you say to yourself, "OK, now I've made it; now I will be happy". But then that fades, too, like smoke in the wind. You are left with just a memory. That and a vague awareness that something is wrong.
Well, in the mining industry's defence, they DID just give a new engineering wing to Curtin in Perth. That shit ain't cheap.
You're saying it's worse then? There's 10 times more fuel at Fukushima than Chernobyl, and radiation readings 40km from the plant that are double that of what's in the 30km deadzone of Chernobyl (readings that were taken in 1986).
http://jayisgames.com/ and http://www.youtube.com/
You said this is in the past 6 months, I recommend getting him checked out by a doctor, this could be a Brain Tumor or some other serious medical malfunction. Approach it as a health concern and he might be more receptive to seeking help.
Actually, most meteorites are not hot when they land. As they hit the atmosphere and begin to burn up, the surface ablates and the inner layers are revealed. Due to the speed of ablation, these inner layers do not have a chance to heat up until they are revealed. Additionally, most meteorites are only in the fireball stage for a very brief while. Earth's atmosphere is thick enough at a high enough altitude that the meteorites generally slow to their terminal velocity around 12-14 miles up (where it is quite cold). Because of this, most meteorites are warm to the touch, if not cold. If the local temperature and humidity are right, the meteorites can actually have frost on them after they land. There are exceptions, of course, as there always are, but this holds true for the overwhelming majority of meteorites. Really, it's the same reason that sky divers don't burn up when they jump out of planes. All of this being said, I still greatly doubt the OP's belief that he was struck by a meteorite. **Edit** It is already April 1 in some parts of the world. I must remember this before I comment in the future...
Man, dogs are the best. I dare you to find me a person who can make you feel that loved.
You sound like the very last patient any doctor would bother doing the extra mile for.
[Here, I brought the penguin back for you.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3RDeegucCD8)
Im so fuckin tired of hearing these "organic" farmers bitch about monsanto and adm.  Farmers account for about 2% of the American population.  That means that 98% of us are relying those few for our food. So guess what? We need their products if we are going to feed ourselves as well as a significant portion of the world.   Everyone cant afford to buy $4 organic tomatoes, so just quit crying that you cant compete with genetically and chemically enhanced crops.  Theres a reason we dont grow crops "naturally" or "organically."  Because its fucking expensive and the yields arent at good. Just because its "natural" or "organic" doesnt make it better. Corn blight and potato famine are natural yet we dont put up with them.  So all you "organic" yuppies need to get off your high hypocritical horses and shut up already. 
But it's the future, so they only have laser guns, so his sheild catches on fire first.
[MercurialMadnessMan thinks so.](http://www.reddit.com/r/aprilfools2011/comments/gfxdc/sega_mega_drive_gets_micro_makeover/) The controller cord there seems a little on the short side if it's real, and the game selection seems kind of random (Sonic Spinball?). No idea what happens if you try to [buy](http://www.firebox.com/product/3455/Sega-MegaDrive-Console) it.
*proofing my point*
Roach/Ling/Infestor will easily beat mutas all day long.
Retardation is a legitimate word. It means delay. Mental retardation is a mental delay, so to speak. What do you call something that delays fire? Fire retardent. I'm not sure on how you delay graphics on crysis 2 though. From my experience with crysis (one), setting the graphics to max will pretty much retard the whole game.
Except girls wear tights too. 
This dude is an awesome troll. I'd buy him a beer. Of course, I'd have to sneak it to him cause he's 12.
How much?
Buh--wha--wh--  Read Neverwhere, dude.  With the exception of some Murakami, I don't think I've ever read another book that I imagined more vividly.
American Dad has a running gag in the opening theme where the headline has something humorous on it. One episode it says, "Abortion debate ended by witty bumper sticker".
As a parent I can say the my child is more important than law.
What the fuck just happened? 
&gt;It would be like saying its illegal to tax income based on the constitution taught in your social studies class that's correct.  Ummm, no? Its perfectly legal to tax income. The Sixteenth Amendment (treated as part of the Constitution) allows it. 
Headshot, headshot, headshot, headshot, headshot, headshot, headshot, headshot, headshot, headshot! Wooooooooo!
While the rest ride anything on two legs.
I believe that Portals spawn in the real world area corresponding to any spot in the Nether in which you have died. I found one in version 1.3 and was hella surprised, but after a little research and exploration, I found an old Nether base that I had left a chest-full of loot in but that I could not locate after dying in a heavy ghast bombardment.  Felt pretty great.  
Imgur links but no "[pic]" in the headline for extra karma!?  This is a rough approximation of reddit at best.
Everything I learn about this stuff I learned from cartoons. So sue me!
wat
twist: *we* are the painting
right, a falling meteor basically turns into liquified metal as it enters the atmosphere. sure it'll cool off a bit while it falls, but it's still going to be hotter than shit and traveling at a high rate of speed when it hits earth, destroying just about anything in its path.  here's one that was documented in 1938. it ripped through the roof of a garage, the metal roof of a car, the cushioned seat of the car, and finally stopped denting the shit out of its muffler.  http://www.hauntedmacoupin.com/images/BenldMeteorite2.jpg  even small meteorites cause huge damage, here's one from 2007 in peru that was about 2cm x 2cm  &gt; The impact created a crater larger than 4.5 m (15 ft) deep, 13 m (43 ft) wide, with visibly scorched earth around the impact site  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Carancas_impact_event  a hand wouldn't fair so well
oslo cofee!??? fucking hipster!
You are going to live a sad and lonely life.
Best rage comic I've seen in some time, fantastic
If this is my son, I was going to get you a car when you get your license.  Troll me and see what happens.  I dare you. *&lt;glare&gt;*
Howard Roark, Architect
April Fools.
Have another upvote doo-doo head.
obvious troll is obvious...
We need a /r/gonewild sleuth to find her
Let's get rid of the free speech one.  I always hate having to argue with people that have different opinions than me.  
I'll be damned if PETA trys to change the name of my stomping grounds. NOT RIGHT.
Yeah that's bullshit. Lawyers and judges don't want an electronic record of what they do.
Draft "Frazzled Editor" and "Symbol Status" Frazzled editor = 2/2 pro everything for 2. It's pretty much unbeatable if it lands. Symbol Status can EASILY net you 6+ tokens if you're playing with a basic land box.  Booster tutor is also a first pick windmill slam bomb.
Works great for me. Even still, I would wait until development if finished before making a judgement.
lulz, yeah I guess not. its pretty close quarters down there though...
if it wasn't part of the original agreement - then it doesn't exist.
I hope It has a strong roof.
This is pretty good general information but I gotta say CDR is incredibly mediocre on Udyr. I think he benefits a lot more from Magic Resist Glyphs  EDIT: it's also usually a good idea to snag a HoG before completing your Trinity(or whatever large item you choose to go). HoG is just too good to pass up early on
Actually, everyone seems to love this movie, I would think that it's more overrated than under.
I tend to eat chocolate pudding over all my mom's favorite sweaters. Thank God for this!!!
Why would the cholesterol level of cooked brain be higher than the cholesterol level of raw brain?
From the looks of your picture the house appears to be pretty sealed off except for the hole at the front. Maybe try corking the hole? I realize the hole is pretty big but a quick trip to a artsy store could land yourself a bee ridding tool.
Ann Rice?
Just talked to a guy with Allied Barton and they have plenty of spots. http://www.greatsecurityjobs.com/SecurityOfficers/SearchOpenPositions/Search.aspx
We owe it to ourselves as the society that these institutions exist to protect to have an acceptable standard in them. Not everyone in them is a murderer or a rapist as so many papers want you to believe.  If you want to 'reform' a criminal for a cash incentive, at what point do you stop and where are the lines drawn? It's a very dark path to tread on, when you're turning prisoners and the prison sector into cash commodities.  Even with a watchdog, there is no way that if this system went large-scale that ANY governmental organisation could monitor the treatment of every prisoner and we would be potentially letting in abuse of prisoners in the name of cost-cutting. Morally speaking, I would not be prepared to accept that.  What better way to promote prisoner reform than 'accidental' starvation perhaps due to an administrative error? Or that time they 'tried' to start a fight with one of the guards and ended up having to be restrained 'for their own safety'. There's way too many dodgy aspects to this, and if you start encouraging private businesses to both make a profit and at the same time not make a loss by encouraging offenders to not re-offend, I suspect things will start going wrong.
My lady friends can confirm this. They typically extend No Shave November to February...
hmm. a part of me thinks wife took picture and laughed at him the whole time, using "bitch wife" to get in touch with the male demographic, thus netting more karma.. [](/beh)   [](/ok "hope im right, so you dont have a bitch wife")
I think he meant nUrfed. 
To be fair, multiple views for different screen sizes and multiple images for those views are sometimes required.  Most things scale automatically, but sometimes you just have to add a special layout for smaller devices.
[Similar ~~Story~~ Stupidity](http://www.reddit.com/r/WTF/comments/g2n9d/the_boy_who_dipped_his_cigarette_in_mercury_and/)
Geez, a lot of people commenting are assholes. This post is pretty powerful, and the comments here should be nothing but love and sympathy not only for the soldier, but also for the brother who lost his hero. Go be a dick somewhere else. 
13/hr seems low for your duties. I'd schedule a meeting with my boss, lay out my responsibilities and accomplishments, and point out that you enjoy your job, but you feel that your salary doesn't meet your job description.   You can make it less confrontational by suggesting as an alternative that your boss could hire someone else to take over these extra duties. It gives your boss another option, but it's cheaper to just give you the raise and if he actually does open up that job you can apply for it as well. A third option would be to ask your boss for a promotion to a more managerial position.   Be proactive, because unless you have a set salary increase in your contract, you probably won't get one until you ask.
&gt; It's reported as an expansion of the program, so at least a minimal increase in spending  what are you basing this on? sounds to me like you are just guessing. in almost every implementation of a voucher program, the per-voucher cost is HALF OR LESS than the per-student cost in the public school system
http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/search?q=underrated+film&amp;sort=relevance
Idiocracy.
I never suggested that elliptical's would increase lean muscle mass. I meant that too intense a workout would be counter-productive for muscle growth. Maybe we should take this conversation to r/fitnesscirclejerk
http://i.imgur.com/agagU.png 
[Poe's Law](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poe's_law) in action my friend.
Seriously, i am fuckin' scared of this site.
Dang ... I don't care, CZs still look sexy.
How pathetic for her in particular, and TDS in general, then.  Rather than exposing bigotry in the vein of Aasif and Wyatt, they have made her, and she agreed to be, an "Oriental"/"Exotic" accessory to it.  Her "character" does not expose, enlighten or further any cause, she is just step-dancing for the trashy crowd the TDS traditionally shuns as they leer, jeer and poke fun at her and who she stands for. Utterly shameful. 
You gotta post!
Well, of course!
++
That is so cool. You are one of like 100 people in all of humanity who have been hit by one!
Uh oh, someone has a different opinion then you, they must be fucking stupid or something.
I liked [this book](http://www.amazon.com/How-Behave-Your-Children-Will/dp/0670891533).  It's solid general advice for raising children and particularly useful if you grew up in an environment you don't want to recreate.
I wanted to mention something, i see a lot of these get downvoted into oblivion before someone mentions something.  I love my fellow fffffffuuuuuuuuuuuu people, and don't want to see their karma take a hit :)
I agree that age alone isn't enough.  There's a good chance it wasn't the only thing, either.  I don't remember the article mentioning the adopters mobility, or apparent state of health. If a spry looking gent of 81 came tap dancing in whole showing off his massive arms it's one thing.  If he comes in really slowly or with a cane, maybe oxygen?  No way.  That doesn't make for good headlines though: "Semi mobile emphesimic 81 year old denied puppy" doesn't cause near the uproar.  I'm sure there is more info than is presented here.
Honestly, I'm not certain of the distinction. A man signing my petition pointed out the denomination. It was in a small town of roughly 1,000 people, so I'm assuming the two knew of each other.
You obviously don't know much about Santa Monica Blvd.
Alright I think its time I get a webcam.  That business sounds fun as hell :)
don't feel bad... some of the best woks in the world are the hand pressed versions you can find in any Chinatown for around $20-$25.  Heat or (BTU) is **MUCH** more important in stir fry cooking, than the type of wok you have...  chin up, buckaroo!
i thought this was meant to be just some random video, not AWE INSPIRING AWESOMENESS
If you're comparing trucks based on seating capacity, I have to question your thought process in buying a *truck* in the first place.
PH - I Can't   Bends - Sulk -- the album could easily finish on Black Star, wouldn't miss it much. Edit: of course I'd miss Street Spirit, I had a minor lapse in tracklisting judgement.  OKC - Fitter Happier or Electioneering -- hard choice, but these two probably jar the most, plus I love the others far too much   Kid A - according to the OP we're exempt!   Amnesiac - Pulk/Pull Revolving Doors   HTTT - Myxomatosis -- maybe a little controversial? I think the album would work without it.   IR - (Why do you do this to me!) Maybe Jigsaw? I seem to have a pattern of getting rid of the loud angry ones!   KoL - Mr. Magpie would not be missed.
Aww.
Yeah, the kids one was sarcasm.
Meteorites are very, very hot? Since when?
Obama.
Well, honestly unless the doctor is a real jerk normally, I think they will likely treat your respectfully and help you find the resources you need. I know that I've been feeling depressed and sort of socially anxious for a while, and haven't gone to see anybody and it's just gotten worse.
but it simulates what naturally occurs in the environment, don't you want your dog to be happy?
Upvoted for speaking truths.  
http://imgur.com/HkHsM
You can lean forward to get under the weight when it rises  above your head though.  If its completely strict, then it is called a military press.
16 = 4 Finance + 4 Ind. Eng + 4 BADM + 4 Project
They couldn't hurt you if you were vertically at the same level as them. Zombies literally walked up and hugged you
True...Also, Perhaps hybrid owners purchased hybrids BECAUSE they drove a lot and they wanted to spend less on fuel.  If they are looking to save money however, they would probably be better off buying a Fit or a Yaris since those cars are 10 grand or more less than a hybrid and it would take YEARS to make that money back in fuel savings
Wait?  People still get their news from TV?
Well, shi'ite.
$50 of weed in a baggie. You get about 3 grams for $50.
From what I've read, you have to work into them.  You'll get stress fractures if you immediately slap them on and go run a 5k. You have to walk in them and work up to running. I have a very very active runner friend who not only uses them to run but wears them all day long.
No, it does not imply that there are only two genders. Rather, it implies the person is attracted to only two. There's distinction.
awesome
1. 4 inch scar on my left knee... I sleep-walked into an antique glass door. Guess shattering the door wasn't enough to wake me up, because I went back to bed and woke up in the morning with a bloody gash in my leg. I was 12 years old and it was Thanksgiving morning.  2. This one time at band camp... I ran into a pole. I was playing tag with some friends in the hallway during rehearsal break and became the first camper in band camp history to go to the hospital... ended up with a skull fracture and a thin scar above my left eye. 
Personally I think flowers are pointless, mainly because I know I'll not take care of them and they'll die prematurely. Unfortunately I fall into the stereotype of "A way to an XY's heart is through his stomach" -- cake is always a winner!
Yes the problems are resolved, but I just followed guides, not really understanding what was happening.. It's a breath of fresh air every time I get back to my windows 7 computer and I feel like I'm finally in control. And that sucks cause I really want to like this open source stuff.
"Ulrich was recently quoted as saying that the band is now free to do as it wishes and they might even 'do the internet thing'."  awesome
We use Citizens bank and love it.  But since we have a HELOC w/ them we're eligible for their "no fee" accounts.
Yea and I don't have to take my cat out for a walk twice a day for fear it's going to shit and pee all over my house.
Also an original content to post on reddit drought.
get berry juice on your finger?
Dat. Ass. 
let's see... the classic one was 'going to the gym' though I do that now.   Going overseas/travel generally, going out, learning to dance, doing martial arts etc.  More adventurous sex life.  Stuff like that
This is why I love ListenToThis. I had never heard of The Sweet, and I love that song, and am going to go listen to a bunch of their other stuff.
1. Face-to-face interaction depends a lot on subtlety. All of that is lost, there's no body language, no inflections in tone, nothing like that. What is gained is a freedom to express oneself in a remarkably candid way. There's no social barriers to break down, they're already broken.   2. Well, the obvious fact is that anonymity allows you to be anyone. You can be as false as you please with no repercussions, there's no reputation to be held accountable to. The interesting part of this is that it also allows you to be *more* genuine, because being totally genuine can carry repercussions in the real world. So, since most of us find wearing a mask more troublesome, I think the anonymity of these sites makes us more genuine. The obvious catch to this is that systems like karma can encourage us to pick up the masks once again and conform to an image that everyone else finds pleasing. I'm not a karma guy myself, I'll say whatever I feel like, so at least *I'm* more genuine on reddit than in real life.  3. I don't think we can easily determine the actual type in real life, but we make our own categories. This guy's the dry intellectual, this guy's the colorful literary type, this guy's the cynic, this guy's the meme-spouting no-original-thoughts type, ect. A typical reddit user is a young college student, very impressionable and hasty to judge, and to be honest kind of stupid.  4. I think of course that social formalities will weaken. However, they shouldn't end up disappearing completely. As for socializing itself, I think that reddit doesn't really represent the future but just an aspect of it. I believe that the idea of "this is how you socialize" will weaken. Nobody will really be making such a distinction between real friends and internet friends. Because it's all real, and especially as we get more and more sophisticated methods of interacting over the net, it will become more and more possible to etch out a meaningful life virtually. I guess what I'm saying that most people will have several modes of socializing, from the fully anonymous social network (4chan) to the non-anonymous social network (facebook), from virtual (second life) to text (reddit).   5. It's definitely making us lazy know-it-alls. Opinions become qualified for a good reason, and that is because the person worked his ass off to become an expert in his field.  6. It's like meeting them inside out because you learn their opinions before their personalities. People are generally stupider than they appear in real life. Some people are more cruel, but most people seem about the same, except more candid of course.  7. I don't really make online friendships like real friendships. I don't feel like anyone knows who I "really" am, but you probably will get a closer idea if you look at my writings and internet presence. I make a different impression online. IRL, I'm a lot less social with people I don't know, but of course I'm a lot more fun with people I do know. It's difficult to be funny online, especially if your natural mode is a more theatrical humor.
welcome to the internet. you must be new here.
Yes, now move on.
Even though we did not have the same experience, I'm glad I could bring back some Nostalgia. :)  BTW, how old were you when you played this?
I don't like your tone sir. 
Looks like something you'd find in Myst or Riven.
Open forums are one thing. My point was to say that if you don't like this thread, down vote it and move on to another thread.   If instead you decide you're going to be a troll and stomp your feet about karma circle jerks while saying that this thread sucks and that remembering the death of someone so many people were fond of is meaningless, well, then you sir deserve to be singled out for the heartless douche that you are.
I have the sneaking suspicion that **THIS VIDEO IS I_RAPE_CATS**
Women like wearing both.
Not since I was a teenager, thankfully. Hang in there bruv, life gets better.
haha my sister's cat does this with live birds. she was not amused.
&gt;Wade did bump him after that hard foul. Hollins did reach his hands out to Wade, which was probably why the double technical was given.  That shouldn't have been a T for *either* of them.  Literally nothing happened.
It's not about the material goods genius. It's about being stress-free.  Most couple list money as the thing they argue about the most. Delete children from the equation and most people will get along just fine with their meager incomes.  No one is saying you personally need to choose between your children and a sports car, but they're choosing that sports car *instead* of *hypothetical* (that means they don't exist) children. You don't need to get so bent out of shape about it. They are their own people, living their own lives, and they don't owe you shit.
ROBERT MORRRRRAAANNN!
I've never heard a more perfect metaphor for reddit. Reddit's community is typically older (see: HEY REDDIT, LOOK WHAT MY 30 YEAR OLD SON DREW FOR ME TODAY), so that analogy is actually quite fitting.
I just won Onyx also. Is Round 2 really nine months away (12/31/11)?  Edit: answer is it doesn't expire until then.
[... it would look like this](http://boards.4chan.org/v/)
If you can find other statistics in the full report, I would love to hear it. This is what I found in my research, and the other tables in the same report back this up as well. This table I cited just had it more succinctly. If I'm wrong please let me know. 
It's easier to airdrop citations than to waste time arguing with idiots. 
no.
Bono.
and why i love being a man
The karma bomb has evaporated by the time you get down here
Also, things change drastically in college. Your future self asked me to tell you that you are really glad you left yourself room in college to explore different interpersonal relationships instead of deciding that the first ripe peach you found was the best one.
We basically all know what the various options are.  I think this one type of tax in particular unjustly effects people, so I think it should be replaced.  Especially since those most hurt by it are the poorest and most powerless.  I think each locality or state should decide on a single method of tax collection. (or if you pushed me, maybe 2 methods)  Something that is simple, transparent, and can be audited.  I really don't care other than that.  It could be a flat tax, consumption tax, taxes just on business, taxes just on citizens, etc.  Let the majority of the citizens in an area decide for themselves what they want; or their elected representatives if the local political model supports it.  But having *every* kind of tax put upon us, with various tax collectors, and little to no oversight, is not good.  When I think about each and every kind of tax that I am subject too, it makes my head spin.  tldr; Tax policy:  Something simple, something just.
i want to meet this guy!
Provided your capped Canadian Intertubes are working, you can find them all online here for free:  http://flag.blackened.net/dinsdale/dna/book1.html  Just replace the "1" at the end with "2", etc, for the sequels.
[better](http://i.imgur.com/RFLx0.jpg)?
dont worry about extra power from a 250. Should take you all of a couple spins around a parking lot to get used to
Too lazy to edit the pics, I normally tri screen it actually. I've got a pretty awesome desktop setup.
I was having that trouble too, so you're not crazy. I've found that I need to create a means to re-flood my farms once every three years or so. I had to abandon a fort due to flooding once (dwarves forgot how to use levers), so I tend to build small storage tanks with just enough water to flood when needed.
It'll try harder next time. 
I used to tell this joke, but then I found out you can embed vim in emacs. 
usb protection dongle for steinberg.i think
There's always money in the cheese stand?
Mike Huckabee, go die in a giant pit of fire. I'm thinking Dark Ages style.
"Complete", "satisfy", "destroy", "finish". Whatever the correct translation may have been, the passage still says that "not the smallest letter, not the least stroke of a pen, will by any means disappear from the Law until"..."heaven and earth disappear".  If heaven and earth have not disappeared then the law engraved in letters on stone is still in effect.  &gt;tl;dr - Romans 3:31  &gt;Do we then overthrow the law by this faith? By no means! On the contrary, we uphold the law.  But what "law" is Paul talking about? Start reading four verses earlier and you will see...  27 Where, then, is boasting? It is excluded. Because of what law? **The law that requires works? No, because of the law that requires faith.** 28 For we maintain that **a person is justified by faith apart from the works of the law.**  In Romans 3 Paul is talking about a new law, a new covenant. He is not talking about upholding the old law. He is talking about upholding the new covenant, "the law that requires faith". Paul is *not* talking about upholding the "the law that requires works".
^^ This. I've heard the same is true for Australian beer as U.S. beer (this comes from an Australian): A large majority of the mass produced stuff is absolutely terrible, but the smaller boutique stuff is generally amazing.
How do you view images inside Reddit?
&gt; used the “largest dataset of psychological measures ever compiled on libertarians”: surveys of more than 10,000 self-identified libertarians gathered online at the website yourmorals.org. A survey on a website? *Really*? Was the older dataset at least collected from the same site? Doesn't say. It may be a good idea to wait and see the actual publication before celebrating. 
You, sir, should have an awesome themesong *abdriged* of course
They need to fix the lame jump packs. It looks stupid how they jump fifty feet up then maintain that exact altitude while moving around horizontally for a while til they run out of thrust. Ruins any sense of immersion when you can see the plane they are glued to moving around. Thrust jumps should follow a parabolic arc.  My personal preference is actually to take out the jumps entirely except for tiny specialized mobility mechs, but that will never happen.
It won't let me download the .dat file. I'm new to all of this stuff, how might I go about possibly fixing that? EDIT: Specifically it tells me there is nothing to read the file and to select one from a list.
I'm a US player, my other US friends are playing now just fine.
Gavin is the man!
&gt;In contrast, the relatively new notion of intelligent design theory implies  new? really? its something old in new wrapping
Actually I do too.  When she said "and your little *pants*," for some reason that won me over.  Can't really explain it.
Yep, saw that too.  We're back on track!
I understand you, I liked a girl very much 6 years ago,she "dumped" me and until today (7 years) I never fell in love with other person. One day (6 years later, last year) I add her on WL Messenger, and the next few days brought again the nice feeling of being in love  And then she stopped talking to me when I tell her that...  I think we just have to have another person in our heart.
I completely agree.  Went for a hike near the Chattooga here in Georgia and it rained the whole time.  The half dome 2 plus was one of the only ones that stayed completely dry.  Tons of room. Basically everything that ^ this guy said. 
You sir are my new hero
lol, ya, im a little high atm
Congrats on your job!   I work with my best friend. Nothing better than that. You guys will have tons of fun adventures.
If I don't have any cash or giftcards, I usually keep walking/driving instead of being yelled at. I feel bad but eh. Otherwise I give them anything extra that I have or a giftcard. 
Cool! I'm going to try this when I get home.  EDIT: I think you meant *.inf*, not .ini by the way. I found *bth.inf* in C:\\Windows\inf, and it contains a bunch of Bluetooth device IDs. There's other info besides the driver ID though, like the name of the device. Do I have to add that? It would be helpful if you could explain your whole process or link me to where you found it. Thanks!
The ability to mindfuck someone.  Literally?
American politics [](/lol)
They're against men's rights? How so?
Since I've moved to Vancouver, I've been getting "Bananas in Pajamas" stuck in my head, at random, but I have yet to discover the reoccurring culprit. Ideas?
I've barked at him. I've used police sirens on him, I've used all types of different sounds but nothing seems to work.
I had a pilonidal cyst, which is an abscess at the top of your buttcrack. I got it removed, and now I have a series of round, raised scars from the sutures. Looks like you could lace up my asscrack like a sneaker.
This is really cool. I'd like to learn to weld!
I call karma whore!
Happy April Fool's to **you!**
judging from libya's oil map if he manages to hold onto ajdabiya... the benghazi ghetto can have all the freedom it wants. but it stands to reason that it's not Westerners plan so... expect slow mission creep.
You'll manage to kill or wound one or two of them before you die.  On a long enough timeline, you run out of perpetrators before you do victims.
Yeah, just something about it that makes you uneasy.
One thing I was wondering was if I could combine some things better. For example, when I start the program, it asks for the number of students.  If I enter, for example, "seventy", the first while loop takes effect and I get the appropriate error message.  If I then enter "70", the second while loop takes effect and, again, I get the appropriate message.  However, if I were to enter "seventy" again, I would keep getting the error message associated with the second while loop.  I know it's probably something simple that I'm overlooking, but I can't figure out how to customize the error message based on the input.
Yep. Just across it in South Jersey.
Because PETA is filled with hypocrites and fund terrorist organizations. I'm all for more ethical treatment of animals, but when you held fun the ALF and... I think it was the ELM? Then you can just go to fucking hell.
I think their opinion is kind of like if someone was on vacation, they would rather have you write them a postcard than make a journal entry about them.  The writing is the same but the belief that it is making it's way to the person in the afterlife is what separates it. 
He has done poorly in the last GSL, the TSL, the Korea vs The World tournament, and the current GSL World Championship.  He is still in my top 3 favorite players.  Purely awesome guy, I hope he secretly shows up at MLG :D.
I met Adam Sessler once. He's a really chill, genuine guy. We talked about the imminent release of XIII... So this was a few years back. Nonetheless, pretty cool experience.
Sock it to me?  -Nixon
Thanks!!!
Maybe I don't consider it an oddity since I went to college in LA... 3.5 hour drive, so it was more of a regularity.  Win for me!  And oh, if you haven't already been to Vegas, if you hit it on a Monday-Thursday night, rooms are cheap!
This is Gillard trying to assert brand difference between Labor and the Greens to try and get some additional support from the center right who are buying into Abbotts claptrap that Brown is running the show in Canberra.
I'm a server! I'm totally keeping a sharpie in my pouch from now on. I'm in!
It's an interesting study but the sample is very skewed. Results are based on surveys taken by students in psychology, sociology, and criminal justice studies. They also only include victimization during the last year. Did you notice that 7% of responses were excluded due to them being presumed to be fake? I found that very odd. Never saw such a high percentage of discarded data before.  It will take a lot more than that to overturn all research already existing all over the world that indicates that men perpetrate about 95% of all sexual violence against adults.
[Beard. No beard.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=na37dOc_XSQ)
google some web proxies and you're fixed.
I saw a local band called Mean Spirits a while back, they opened for...Sunset Rubdown, I think? Anyway, between songs someone in the audience shouted "FREEBIRD!"  The bassist gave the guy this withering gaze and said "Do you really want us to play Freebird? I mean, we can play it. If you really want to hear it."
Yeah, guess I should clarify.  I shouldn't have said 'easier to harder', but I guess no one word is adequate for this situation. I meant starting with an exercise where X weight (135) is challenging, then going into exercises where that same weight would *normally* be easy to do (if you can snatch 135, that's easy for cleans, very easy for high pulls, and complete weaksauce for deadlifts).  So when doing this, the weight change is minimal. You might use a heavy weight for singles at snatch, keep that weight for higher rep cleans, then add on another plate for low rep high pulls and then finish with the same weight at higher rep deads.  If done in reverse (starting with deads, going to snatches) you would start with like, 4-5 plates on deads and then work to snatches which, in a weakened state, would be less than the snatches in the previous example; lot more plate changing.  Plus, you're more liable to hit yourself in the face during a snatch if it's last in your workout.  So my stance is on the changing of exercises. If doing the same exercise (as is your example) and factoring out fatigue (as in your last comment), I doubt there would be any differences.
That dude is like a walking high-five, I need a co-worker like that
No, there is no mandatory registration.
I absolutely agree that out of any given, large enough population, a certain percentage will be a total nutsack.   &gt;They interpreted Quran texts differently, and arguably out of context.   Part of the problem is that I'm pretty sure they can make the same argument about you, and make good arguments for their position.   The concept of wasatiah seems peaceful and good, but the article has some quotes that make me wonder, like this one: "Radicalism and the claim of exclusive monopoly for the truth is the disease." Isn't islam and all other religions full of "claims of exclusive monopoly for the truth"? The muslim creed, "There is no god but God, and Muhammad is the messenger of God.", springs to mind as an example. &gt;To answer your first paragraph, again, there's no definitive punishment for apostasy.   This illustrates my point perfectly. You seem to have a fairly good grasp of your religion, and you make a good point why there's no punishment for apostasy. However, a prominent British muslim, Dr. Mohamad Mukadam, the chairman of the association of muslim schools in the country replied the following when asked about the punishment for apostasy in islam: "if it's an islamic country, then the sharia is very clear: apostasy is dealt with the death penalty." (The whole debate is available on Youtbe, here's [a relevant clip](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=pQzuFrMRA3M) from it.) I think it's fair to assume that he too has fairly good knowledge about islam, and he could probably argue his case as well as you argue yours. It's probable that both your views can be justified and that you're just a better person tham him, but that doesn't change the fact that he can make such claims and say that he's obeying god's law.   &gt;Only certain countries are still practicing that, and we can safely say that they are not highly developed countries.   Absolutely, but the fact remains that our modern societies have moved away from such barbarism not because of, but in spite of, religion. Religion usually has to be dragged kicking and screaming into modernity. I'll cite a few cases from christianity since that's the context I've been raised in and am the most familiar with: * The Copernican world view and other scientific progress  * Slavery  * Women's rights  These are not minor issues, and most people in modern societies agree on them, yet they're issues that religious texts, leaders and traditions frequently get wrong.   Well, it's time for bed again. Thanks again for your replies. This is quite interesting, and I'm learning a lot, even though I don't agree with everything you say.
Indeed, no.   Think this through a bit, if every employer was required the raise their wage by the same amount at the same time, what would happen? Everyone would still have the same relative amount of income, that's just called inflation.
Sounds like I'm doing someone's job for them.
I totally agree with you here. But after using the stock Froyo on my HTC Desire for over 8 months, I finally pulled the trigger and rooted and flashed to CM7 RC2 (now on RC4) and could not be happier.   The improvements that you get with custom ROMs are so worth it than waiting and waiting for updates from the provider or manufacturer.   Saying all that I would only consider known custom ROMs and would take the risk (if any) to completely take ownership of the phone I paid for rather than settling with the non custom ROMs limitation.
The next century will hold pictures by the dozens of those amongst us who have gotten famous (depending on whether people still become famous) as well as all the thoughts, status' and feelings we have let loose across this great vast wealth of internet.
i dont you are gonna be able to do any of those static holds.....
Sometimes doing the right thing won't make you money or make you happy, often the opposite. This is a very reductive viewpoint, but I understand the what he is trying to say. You have to take a mental step outside your current emotions and analyze it rationally for the greater good of all those involved.
me too, but I see a lot of posts of artwork created by redditors and I'm constantly impressed.
On the subject of your shocking issue, circa 2001, I was tasked with installing a new water cooling system for a friend (who is also a tech). I don't know why he wanted me to do it, but I digress.   The cooling system was made by Thermaltake. I read the directions and part of it was if you had a steel case (I did in this case) to put the really strong magnets it included on the outside of the case, to mount the reservoir to the system.   I did as the directions had told me and went to try the system. My friend was on the way, so I wanted to ensure it was running well. As soon as I plugged in the computer and hit the power button, there was a hell of a bang and holy smoke. It didn't power up past that.   My friend came into the house as the smoke cleared and I sprayed room freshener. I told him he could be the first to test it and he plugged it in, hit the power button and nothing happened.   He said he may have used a bad power supply and he would get a new one to me that he had laying around. I never told him what happened until a few years after that happened. Thankfully, it was only the power supply that fried. 
safari on windows is the kind of crap i would expect my anti-virus to find and destroy.
I keep reading about how fun it is to drive a manual. Can you explain? I've driven both (prefer auto) and have never had "fun" driving other than enjoying the scenery. What does this mean? That you get to burn peels into the asphalt?  You get race or play chicken with your buddies? Please explain all this fun you're having because driving for me is simply trying to get from one place to another with as little hassle as possible
Two minutes later they were laying around picking their teeth.
Sesame chicken wings.  Let's see ... [these](http://www.epicurious.com/recipes/food/views/Sticky-Sesame-Chicken-Wings-234650) look good. Crudite with bagna cauda.   Get a can of cannellini beans, drain.  Mash 'em up but good with some pureed garlic, best olive oil and a bit of fresh finely chopped rosemary. May need some salt, depending on the beans. Great with crostini.   Sliders. Fondue.  
Would've been funnier if they hadn't been so heavy-handed with the warning :/
&gt;It's not about overall cost. As previously mentioned, that is a ridiculous way of doing things. And if each person in the car puts an equal share towards gas money, it does get cheaper for me.  WTF? What is each person putting in an equal share towards? *The overall cost of fuel!* You did read this after you wrote it, didn't you???  &gt;you continue to ignore the fact that the government's own report has shown trains to be less efficient in terms of the money needed to move people  Which government? [Ours?](http://www.gao.gov/new.items/d09317.pdf) Or were you referring to [another government?](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Planned_high-speed_rail_by_country)   &gt;As previously mentioned, the trains run on diesel,  [Wrong.](http://www.cahighspeedrail.ca.gov/project_vision.aspx)  &gt;To say that it's somehow more efficient to poor money into two huge bureaucratic processes instead of making one slightly bigger is completely ridiculous.  So then, by your own words, you would rather *pour* the money into one "huge bureaucratic process" to make it bigger. Why? Isn't that exactly the kind of pie-in-the-sky, liberal, tax &amp; spend, government money wasting boondoggle that you accuse HSR of being? Especially when pouring money into freeways won't solve any thing except freeway congestion? Temporarily??? That's like going on a diet by buying a bigger belt every few years.  &gt;I suspect you've got a case of lipsonyo'president'sdick syndrome  Sticks &amp; stones...
Well, tomorrow them if they stop electing Republicans. 
It's true
What's the deal with the grammar in this comment? Seriously, someone tell me 'cause I'm quite buzzed!
If you can name more sequels equal (or superior) to the original in quality than I can name inferior, then you've got a solid argument.  The problem is, outside of a very small handful of sequels, they are inferior to the original.  Based on the percentages, chances are Ghostbusters 3 will be, at best, not as good as Ghostbusters.  It doesn't mean it will suck, but it just won't be as good.
Looks like somebody submitted it. http://digg.com/news/entertainment/testing_out_my_new_wallet
I &lt;3 Scintilla.
This sounds like a very good idea. This will increase the residents choice in which schools to send their children to. Well let me rephrase, This is only a good idea as long as they lower the money that the public schools get by $100M.
Yes.  I have a friend who is majoring in GIS and minoring in CS.  If anything, both degrees will boost each other well.  The market needs GIS programmers right now.  Go for it! :)
As do I.  My brother, who lives in Hannover, has told me of driving on the Autobahn.
choice in music
Oh my god those had me in tears.  /bookmarks site for all eternity
I'm reading reddit on the internets, this looks like an interesting post.... OMG, WTF??
That's sick. Poor palm tree!
Woah man I'm not into the gay stuff.
Why would you defer to experimentation? Would you exclude all claimed science not subject to experimentation? Wouldn't you have to reject the big bang and abiogenesis, since experimentation cannot prove either?   There are no wild assumptions in my argument. Both premises are known truths and scientifically backed. The conclusion logically follows from the premises, with no proven or scientifically based alternative.  
I would buy that Creeper Saddle.
See Stevens, Kenneth N. 2000. *Acoustic Phonetics.* MIT Press, in particular section 9.2.  http://books.google.com/books?id=Gej94hCGrLMC&amp;lpg=PP1&amp;dq=kenneth%20stevens%20acoustic%20phonetics&amp;pg=PA487#v=onepage&amp;q&amp;f=false
Yeah, fuck people making stereotypes about women! Let's make stereotypes about America instead, because no other country bashes on sluts.
Thanks for all the responses!  More background-I live in a 1950's style two-family apartment on the second floor.  This house is old and small, but  still nice.  The landlady lives on the first floor (she thinks the place is haunted, but I haven't experienced anything strange).  I've lived here for five years, so I know every area of the house.  I was doing laundry last night in the basement, and thought /r/creepy might like a pic of the "mysterious" door.
Downvoted for not saying what fucking movie this is.
It happened often when I worked in retail / restaurants, and I hated every minute of it. When I was hostessing, one guy even went so far to as to show me pics of his dick on his cell phone (he had been hanging around my hostess stand waiting for his table, making inappropriate chitchat. I told him I had a boyfriend and started waiting on other people, then he whips out the pics 'to show me what I'm missing.') It was horrifically violating, and the bouncers threw him out, but I was completely shaken. How dare he? How dare he force me, a stranger,  to engage a sexual game, while I am working and forced to make small talk with him? The problem is that most tools mistake politeness and good customer service as an open invitation - if she hasn't told me to fuck off yet, I must have an in with her! 
E-HAN TIMINGUU!!!
It pisses me off that people other than me get to have sex with that.
miss focus?
ooo, telling Blake that he can put the video back up sounds like she is giving a legal opinion on the matter and you can't do that without a license to practice. I hope she doesn't get in trouble because I really do enjoy watching her videos.  
VW Golfs are nice. From the speed, I'm guessing a Golf R (or possibly a GTI going as fast as it can). How was the handling at that speed?  I have a 2.0 TDI DSG, which is electronically limited to 125 mph. I'd love to be able to get it up to its maximum speed just to know what it's like, but the only way I'll ever manage that is on a track. At the speeds I *have* driven it, it has always felt very planted and secure, with plenty of power left. (Some reviewers struggle to find the power in TDIs, but I think that's because they're driving a manual, but shifting it like it was a non-diesel.)
Name that pokemon!
fucking awesome, thats what.  This is the best troll site i have ever seen in my life.  They deserve every bit of traffic they get
Cat will break your heart, and you will love every miserable minute. I hate&lt;love my cat.
credibility gone!
What part? :D
Still one of the weirdest terms in the scene. I understand how 90% of the playerbase wants to be Korean and will even mimic their bad English grammar ("You're bad manner!") in order to fit the stereotype, but calling someone from your own country a foreigner is beyond me.
Sorry, eleven hours.
I bet you're uglier. 
He was probably crushed because he knows he is good enough to beat anyone, especially Anypro. Was probably super frustrating to lose 2-0.
Now to bust out my three fedoras and snap pictures.  Too bad one of them is too small. Apparently my grandfather had a smaller head than me.
Your point is valid, about "no army in Palestine" being disproved by your statistics.  I just want to point out, as a total side issue, that a lot of the disparity in % of people killed who are combatants has to do with the IDF being a very good army and the Palestinian militias being really shitty armies.  IIRC, full combatants were 50% of casualties in the last war with Lebanon, compared to 18% in the second intifada.  
Democracy isn't some catch-all phrase you can use when you don't feel government working for you. Debates are not produced by the government, rather the TV networks who are free to choose who they want. Are you competent?
We tried writing fantasies as a way of being open about sex with out having to talk about it. We agreed that if we did not want to do the fantasies then we would discuss them to see why they were fantasies. This simply became a box of notes she was afraid of, an elephant in the room that was more pain than it solved.
Grandma?
You were doing pretty good there for a bit.
I have been in pain that the hospital was unable to control, so I am fully aware that death is sweet relief.
Ah, thanks for the answer. That's what I'd heard and I wondered if it was true. So is there a certain grudge against non-locals that you're aware of? And how bad is traffic?
One time when I was a cashier, I got a call from one of my coworkers at another location. She was all giggly and told me to go to some craigslist url. I opened it, and it turned out to be a "lost connection" that went something like this, "(Company I worked for) Beauty, I see you walk out of your store each night with that smile on your face and hope to get to know you better. (Description of me.) Wait outside on (such and such date) if you want to meet me..." Of course the grammar and spelling were almost incomprehensible.   I was so creeped the fuck out, especially since I worked at the store alone. There wasn't a night I didn't run to my car after closing. I'd take a guy hitting on me face to face over that creepy stalker bullshit any day.   But either way, yes I hate getting hit on at work.
I just use one of [these](http://de.academic.ru/pictures/dewiki/83/Shotgun_Mossberg_590.jpg)
This isn't a correct application of Bayesian statistics. The problem is *not* that Christianity has no evidence in its favour, it's that it has *insufficient* evidence. For example, the Gospels are evidence for the resurrection of Jesus; however, because common experience dictates that the a priori probilitity for a supernatural event must necessarily be extraordinarily low and because there are many reasons to believe the Gospels are unreliable, they do not qualify as *good* evidence. In particular, there are other explanations for why they were written with a much higher Bayesian probability.  To borrow an example from r/atheism's resident patriarch, NukeThePope: I claim that I have a 10 inch male implement. You are incorrect if you respond, "You have no evidence of that"- of course I have evidence, I have my personal testimony. You just heard it. But it's not good evidence for the claim, it's not sufficient. There are more plausible explanations that account for the evidence.  This is cute, but it's bad math.
It's like Kirby being released in the US.
lmao a comment history full of free market shilling what a fucking surprise
cp... warmfront?
I believe that children all go to be with God, and I think that what age you are a child until is subjective to your society  I don't think that it is necessary to be taught bible stories and go to church and be told the name Jesus to know God. I believe that knowing beauty, knowing love, knowing compassion and forgiveness is knowing God and that He knows all including our true hearts
Or perhaps it was the...left... answer?
Foot long or 6 inch?
None, I would just be added onto my mothers policy, but since she owns two cars and there are two licensed drivers, I would have to be a primary.
It would seem that the Ferengi are many centuries behind Humans in advertisement technology.  
Let's send him to that Barack Obama Elementary School in Main so he can learn about the 57 states!
I ride a fixed gear with a front brake. Why? Because riding fixed is extremely fun, and really forces me to work on pushing a higher cadence. A bike with a single speed drivetrain is really easy to maintain and pretty much always run.  I run a front brake because it allows me to stop faster in emergencies, and it's easy enough to take off for when I take my bike to the local velodrome :)  Riding fixed instead of single speed gives you a lot of control over your speed without having to ride your brake all the time. Normally this doesn't matter too much, but when riding too class through a bunch of other students, it's quite useful.
&gt; Where is the fairness in locking people up for crimes that hurt nobody?  That is a problem with the law, not with the prison system. Apples and oranges here.
So then would you not agree with me that your earlier statement of 'no one else bears any guilt' is false, because if you are not acting to fight the ways in which our culture normalizes rape, you are contributing?
yeah, it's like people that say "awkward" in an awkward situation.  Stewart's looking awkward makes the situation more awkward than it should be.
I have a 5" long almost-scar along my arm, from playing Ring of Fire a bit too enthusiastically. It's still healing, so I don't know how much it will scar, but it looks badass and doesn't at all gel with the good Catholic girl image my family have of me :D
Unless you live in Europe and almost every knows how to drive stick.
I live in San Francisco and drive a manual... With the some of the ridiculously vertical hills here I admit sometimes it simply cannot be done.  If you can parallel park on a hill like [this](http://farm4.static.flickr.com/3612/3362499153_69623e3132.jpg) without a gut wrenching fear of hitting something then I give you props.   edit: Now that I think about it I've parked on hills like this in an automatic and nearly pissed myself as well.  Fuck these parking spots.
[Lousville is third in attendance](http://www.ncaa.org/wps/wcm/connect/8753820042742b01b8b6be967b4a3893/Awide_Mbkbattlists.pdf?MOD=AJPERES&amp;CACHEID=8753820042742b01b8b6be967b4a3893).
"Hi.  I'm Kurt Vonnegut."
Jungle Basin proxy pylons and SCV-hiding. Those darn /r/trees. Oh wait. Why am I so hungry?
I have used it on multiple (read &gt;50) for 2 plus years, it is a good product. The issue was an elevated risk not a detection, and it was resolved this morning, as I tested it on xp and win7 neither detected the existence of a c:\windows\sl directory.
I enjoyed it! Thanks!
Although I didn't have the problems that you did, my father was an alcoholic, and died when I was 15.  I was 37 when my son was born, and I was determined to be there for him and raise him in a loving environment, and I think I did pretty well.  At 23, he tells me how much he loves me and his mother, and appreciates the life he had growing up.  The best advice I have is to be involved in her life and interests (without being too intrusive).  Your post shows that you care and have a pretty good handle on what NOT to do.  On that note, I think you'll do fine - it's amazing what you'll learn about parenting as you go.
Hahaha I actually did find that by accident.  I couldn't figure out for the life of me how to kill it, not realizing for a good 15 minutes that I couldn't kill it, and in all the shooting and jumping I found it after trying to power bomb him.  The ones that took me the longest to find was the missle expansion like 3 tiles into the ceiling right before entering the room where you got the speed booster, and another shaft one like the turtle room on they way to the mini-boss room in norfare (Crocomire I think is his name?)  But yeah, Iy went through bombing and visoring everything.  I was like 9, and madly obsessed.
Please convince me to buy the MLB.TV premium sub! I want so bad, but worried I'll be let down. 
Bro, you scared to post your pic? Seems like someone is chicken.
Shit man. Can't a guy show a little fucking class without getting his ass reamed?
Seems like they've got their George W. Bush. Good luck, Canucks.   A neighbor.
AudioJungle has a good selection, if you have the time to sift out the cheesy ones.
Official deal? If he was a noob it's all the more reason for a full face. Not that it's going to help him at this point. 
By straight I sure hope you mean vanilla, heteronormative heterosexuals, because there is such a thing as a queer heterosexual. The more you know.
OMGGGGGGGGG ... u r delicious !!
I bicycle to 4th and King from the Castro, take Caltrain to Cal. Ave, and bike from there to the office.  The time on the train I can read the Intertubes, which I'd be doing at some point anyway, and the time on the bike is exercise that I (mostly) enjoy.  If I had to use buses for the local part of that I'd be *reconsidering things*, but as is it's working pretty well for me.
Why has youtube not updated the view count
In a mining company as well, and they did all the above.
lame. new video please.
they should put the NES on the floor beside the TV to allow for an unobstructed view :|
The Libyan Propaganda machine has been working full tilt the past two weeks to stage civilian casualties, to the point where they have allegedly pulled bodies out of a morgue to throw around a small building where they apparently blew up a few grenades.  Then there are the stories of reporter being taken to see bombed civilian buildings only to "get lost" for hours on end driving around Tripoli.  I'd bet this is more of the same.
That's a cool little fact. I didn't know you had to have a license to collect reptiles.
Just one repeater and it can be fully automatic. Wicked cool!
What field.  I have a grad degree in math and I have only used matlab.
Afridi might take it
Saying it's a percentage of of GDP is pointless. The actual rate at which the company is taxed at is what is important.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Corporate_tax#Corporate_tax_rates
thanks!
I can not WAIT till may the 21st, i just want to go to everyone who believes this and point and laugh, i mean a proper obnoxious laugh, I want to see them cry.
Labeling would help too. But that's neither here nor there, awesome work dude.
Well good luck finding something. Perhaps check Wiki for your current medication to see if it mentions treating anxiety, or - if it doesn't - you can see a link between it and Seroquel in case he is trying to treat you for something else.
"NO GIRLS ON OUR TEAM!"
Let's not conflate efficiency with dictatorship.  Efficiency in the context of dictatorship means one person can make all the rules immediately.  Efficiency in the economic sense means being able to use the least amount of resources to produce the most output.  That was what I meant by efficiency.  Then how does libertarian socialism propose to counter "oppression?"  You're right that "direct democratic small society/city states did not go to the feudal system democratically."  For instance, those Greek city states (when not fighting one another) were invaded by the Persians.  According to libertarianism, as much as we want small government, we would never propose to get rid of it completely as we see the state as required to provide public defense and order.  What is libertarian socialism's take on that?
Looks genuine to me: [here](http://scans.startiger.com/showscan.php?scanid=25111) is one a friend of mine got In Person in 2004.
If it's just a couple of months, maybe look into getting travel insurance from Canada. I was able to get 4 months of insurance in China for about $150 USD through AAA. I'm sure CAA will offer a similar rate.
[Yes, better to let them starve to death than to shoot them.  Poor endangered elephants.  Bad rich white guys!](http://www.africahunting.com/content/2-managing-african-elephant-populations-act-let-die-401/)
You didn't get hit by a meteor.
this reminds me of labyrinth.
When I realized that my two favorite cable channels are HGTV and the Food Network.  I honestly care more about real estate, interior design, and cooking than whatever it is that young people watch.  Edit:  I actually request these two channels at the gym when I'm on the treadmill.  I am more interested in what Mike Holmes has to say about home inspection than all the young hot ass parading in front of me.  :|
It was a shaky in-motion picture, that is why it looks odd.
vomit+superman tower of terror (the free falling one)= you can imagine the rest.....  PS I threw up just as we started falling
Took me quite a long time to understand what the hell you were doing 2 days in the future, then I got past the first /...
How to choose a baby movement monitor
Coopers is good. Only the Red and Green though, might be a bit easier to find in the U.S. than Little Creatures.  EDIT: Little Creatures Bright Ale is the one you want to try if you can mate.
Currently it does not work for 1.4 but the mod creator said he is going to try and get 1.4 up asap.
next time you have the opportunity to shoot an event like this please HOLD THE CAMERA STEADY!!!!!!  either film or dance, don't do both.
20 years ago, nothing would have happened as the result of that minor confrontation.  I wouldn't have objected to no technical fouls being handed out, too.
yeah, i made one of those too... only took me 249 hours. But seriously why is it worth so much?
SHAT  LIKE A BOSS!
Presumably, you have had 22 years of being a successful adult.  Use that as your influence and not what happened to you as a child.
I am always awaiting big news about an asteroid. Preferably that we are finally going to one, rather than the other way around.
I quickly scanned through some of his pages (the offical site, last.fm, bandcamp) and turned up no clues as to his beliefs or influences. Actually all the descriptions of him and his music are about as minimalistic as the dark eerie sound he produces.. Cool stuff though.
I happen to be girl, so I can say on good authority that not every woman is looking for a guy to be in control. If I'm interested in someone, I say so like an adult rather than trying to manipulate them into making a move. 
I agree, I was just explaining how I am using it.  Whenever you start talking about axioms and rational thought it seems like the most straight forward definition.
Try speaking. That usually works.
I'll give you one. The WhiteKnight Two, or a similar design, is perfectly capable of dropping something like a space shuttle SRB with a capsule on top. Bang, instant orbital insertion. That's one of the proposed steps from sub to full orbital.
It was taken down. Here's another [link](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3Y6aMrfZH4w) that works for now. 
you are so fucking witty it's *unreal*.  you should do stand up.  seriously.  you are *that* funny.  holy shit.
Slowest to come when jerking it in the midst of a bunch of boners?  I'll take that deal.
OK, well again, if your eczema is quite bad I can recommend azathioprine (correct spelling this time).  I don't know if it is expensive in your country, it is subsidised here in NZ.  Its not a new drug, though, so there should a generic option available.  It's called Imuran in the US.  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Azathioprine
What a pompous ass.  Here's a question we can forward to him:  What makes you think you're an authority on anything?
Logical assertions without evidence? You mean like the axioms on which we base all mathematics and science? Why is this argument inappropriate? Because you dislike it? 
http://online.wsj.com/article/SB121623686919059307.html?mod=yhoofront  http://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/10.1111/j.1469-5812.2010.00672.x/abstract  http://www.huffingtonpost.com/2011/01/18/45-of-students-dont-learn_n_810224.html
